February 2002 An Annotated Bibliography: Type 2 Diabetes in Children and Adolescents The increase in type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents is a growing concern in the United States and around the world.
This bibliography is an online resource for health care professionals and adults with special interest in diabetes in children and adolescents.
It is arranged in three major categories: general information, risk factors, and special populations at high risk for the disease.
For inclusion in the bibliography, journal articles, papers, and other materials had to address one or more of the following issues concerning type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents: diagnosis, treatment and care, prevention, risk factors, and at-risk populations, including African Americans, Asians, Hispanic Americans, and North American Indians.
In addition, this bibliography cites only materials published since 1990.
Compiled to provide state-of-the-science research and hypotheses on type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents, the bibliography is scheduled for periodic updates and revisions.
By reviewing the wide range of titles, readers can see where researchers are improving our understanding of the disease and where gaps still exist.
General Information American Diabetes Association.
American Diabetes Association: Clinical practice recommendations 2001.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24(suppl 1):S1-133.
These clinical practice guidelines from the American Diabetes Association contain the "Report of the Expert Committee on the Diagnosis and Classification of Diabetes Mellitus" as well as position statements on a number of topics such as screening, standards of medical care, nutrition, exercise, preventive foot care, management of dyslipidemia, aspirin therapy, smoking, preconception care of women with diabetes, diabetic nephropathy, diabetic retinopathy, gestational diabetes, tests of glycemia in diabetes, hyperglycemic crises, food labeling, role of fat replacers in diabetes medical nutrition therapy, management of diabetes in correctional institutions, care of children with diabetes in the school and daycare setting, management of diabetes at diabetes camps, concurrent care, unproven therapies, and third-party reimbursement for diabetes care, self-management education, and supplies.
Also included are a list of technical reviews, a list of consensus statements, and national standards for diabetes selfmanagement education.
1
American Diabetes Association.
Care of children with diabetes in the school and day care setting; Position statement.
Diabetes Care.
2001;23(suppl 1).
School and daycare personnel must have an understanding of diabetes and its management to facilitate the appropriate care of children with disabilities.
Knowledgeable personnel are essential if children are to achieve the good metabolic control required to decrease the risks for later development of diabetic complications.
Diabetes education needs to target daycare providers, teachers, and other school personnel who interact with children with diabetes, such as administrators, coaches, school nurses, health aides, bus drivers, and secretaries.
This position statement provides recommendations for the management of children with diabetes in the school and daycare setting.
General guidelines address development of a diabetes care plan, responsibilities of the various stakeholders, and expectations of children in diabetes care.
American Diabetes Association.
Type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents; Consensus statement.
Diabetes Care.
2000;23(3):381-389.
Several studies have documented the recent sharp increase in type 2 diabetes among children and adolescents.
In light of this epidemic and the fact that little is known about type 2 diabetes in children, the American Diabetes Association convened a panel of experts to review current trends and to develop consensus about the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of type 2 diabetes in young people.
Amiel SA, Caprio S, Sherwin RS, Plewe G, Haymond MW, Tamborlane WV. Insulin resistance of puberty: A defect restricted to peripheral glucose metabolism.
Journal of Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism.
1991;72:277-282.
To examine mechanisms underlying the development of insulin resistance during normal puberty, sequential 8 and 40 mU/m2.min euglycemic insulin clamp and hyperglycemic clamp studies were performed in 14 healthy prepubertal and 19 pubertal children.
The low as well as the high insulin dose stimulated peripheral glucose uptake much more effectively in prepubertal children.
In contrast, puberty did not affect suppression of hepatic glucose production and lowering of substrates in response to insulin at either dose.
During the hyperglycemic clamp, pubertal children showed enhanced insulin responses and in turn a sharper fall in amino acids.
This study suggests that insulin resistance during puberty is restricted to peripheral glucose metabolism.
Selective insulin resistance leading to compensatory hyperinsulinemia may serve to amplify insulin's effect on amino acid metabolism, thereby facilitating protein anabolism during this period of rapid growth.
Bricker LA, Draznin MB, Hare JD, Greydanus DE. Diabetes in adolescent patients: Diagnostic dilemmas.
Indian Journal of Pediatrics.
2001;68(3):223-227.
The classification of diabetes by types (1 or 2) or by age of onset (juvenile or adult) helps to clarify many aspects of pathophysiology, prognosis, and therapy.
However, less commonly encountered patients, presenting in childhood or adolescence, may not fit
2
neatly into a particular group.
These include teenagers who present with new-onset diabetes with ketoacidosis, but later can manage the disease permanently as type 2 diabetes.
Other adolescent patients present with only minimal glucose intolerance, then proceed to develop type 1 diabetes, with evidence of autoimmune etiology, after a variable number of years.
The authors describe four patients to illustrate these diagnostic dilemmas.
Callahan ST, Mansfield MJ. Type 2 diabetes mellitus in adolescents.
Current Opinion in Pediatrics.
2000;12(4):310-315.
Type 2 diabetes is being diagnosed more frequently in children and adolescents.
Genetic predisposition and environmental factors are important determinants of this disease.
African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and Native Americans are known to be at higher risk for type 2 diabetes.
Obesity, sedentary lifestyle, and high-fat diet contribute to this disease.
A combination of peripheral insulin resistance and relative insulin deficiency results in chronic hyperglycemia.
The onset of hyperglycemia is usually slow, and symptoms such as polyuria and polydipsia are often subtle and may go unrecognized by patients.
The treatment of children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes is an area of active study.
Programs targeting diet modification and increased physical activity aim to delay or prevent the onset of this disease.
The authors examine risk factors for type 2 diabetes, review diagnostic criteria, and discuss newly established screening criteria for the disease in children and adolescents.
Cara JF. Type 2 diabetes mellitus in children.
Paper presented at 2000 American Academy of Pediatrics Annual Meeting.
Journal of Pediatrics.
2000;136(3):365-369.
The recently observed increase in the incidence and prevalence of type 2 diabetes in children concerns general and specialty pediatricians alike, primarily because of the longterm consequences for the individual and the public health implications of the condition.
An increased understanding of its classification and diagnosis, scope, pathophysiology, clinical presentation, treatment, prevention, and screening--all of which are discussed in this paper--is critical to reducing the potential burden of childhood type 2 diabetes on the individual, family, and society as a whole.
Cutfield WS, Wilton P, Bennmarker H, Albertsson-Wikland K, Chatelain P, Ranke MB, Price DA.
Incidence of diabetes mellitus and impaired glucose tolerance in children and adolescents receiving growth-hormone treatment.
Lancet.
2000;355(9204):610-613.
Although growth hormone (GH) contributes to insulin resistance, it has not been established whether children treated with GH are at increased risk of diabetes.
A retrospective analysis of data from an international pharmacoepidemiological survey of children treated with GH discovered that the incidence and age at diagnosis of type 1 diabetes in children treated with GH did not differ from expected values.
The incidence of type 2 diabetes was sixfold higher than reported in children not treated with GH. Type 2 diabetes did not resolve after GH therapy was stopped.
GH treatment did not affect the incidence of type 1 diabetes in any age group.
The authors postulate that the
3
unexpectedly high incidence of type 2 diabetes with GH treatment may be an acceleration of the disorder in predisposed individuals.
Fagot-Campagna A. Emergence of type 2 diabetes mellitus in children: Epidemiological evidence.
Journal of Pediatric Endocrinology 
2000;13(6):1395-1402.
Type 2 diabetes has been reported in American Indian, African American, Hispanic, Asian American, and white children from North America.
Children diagnosed with type 2 diabetes in the United States were generally overweight, had a strong family history of the disease, and often had signs of insulin resistance.
The majority belonged to ethnic groups at high risk for type 2 diabetes.
More girls than boys were diagnosed.
The few followup data available suggest a high prevalence of microvascular and macrovascular complications among young adults who developed type 2 diabetes during childhood.
As obesity increases in several industrialized or industrializing countries, a similar increase in type 2 diabetes in children may soon emerge worldwide and will require preventative measures.
Fagot-Campagna A, Narayan KMV, Imperatore G. Type 2 diabetes in children.
British Medical Journal.
2001;322(7283):377-378.
Among U.S. children, the mean age at diagnosis of type 2 diabetes is 12 to 14 years.
This chronic disease affects girls more than boys, affects predominantly people of nonEuropean origin, and is associated with obesity, physical inactivity, a family history of type 2 diabetes, exposure to diabetes in utero, and signs of insulin resistance.
Epidemiological data on the magnitude of the problem, its secular trends, and followup of incident cases are needed for several at-risk populations.
Adult studies have shown efficacious interventions for type 2 diabetes, but their safety and efficacy in children are not known.
The quality of care for adults with type 2 diabetes remains suboptimal, and this situation is likely to be worse for children and adolescents.
Adolescents may be particularly reluctant to make behavioral changes, manage their disease, and accept followup.
Fagot-Campagna A, Pettitt DJ, Engelgau MM, Burrows NR, Geiss LS, Valdez R, Beckles GLA, Saaddine J, Gregg EW, Williamson DF, Narayan KM. Type 2 diabetes among North American children and adolescents: An epidemiologic review and a public health perspective.
Journal of Pediatrics.
2000;136(5):664-672.
This study reviewed the magnitude, characteristics, and public health importance of type 2 diabetes in North American youth.
Among North American Indians age 15 to 19, prevalence of type 2 diabetes per 1,000 was 50.9 for Pima Indians, 4.5 for all U.S.
American Indians, and 2.3 for Canadian Cree and Ojibway Indians in Manitoba.
From 1967-76 to 1987-96, prevalence increased sixfold for Pima Indian adolescents.
Among African Americans and whites age 10 to 19 in Ohio, type 2 diabetes accounted for 33 percent of all cases of diabetes.
Youth with type 2 diabetes were generally age 10 to 19, were obese, had a family history of type 2 diabetes, had acanthosis nigricans, belonged to
4
minority populations, and were more likely to be girls than boys.
At followup, glucose control was often poor, and diabetic complications could occur early.
Fagot-Campagna A, Saaddine JB, Engelgau MM.
Is testing children for type 2 diabetes a lost battle [letter to the editor]? Diabetes Care.
2000;23(9):1442-1443.
The American Diabetes Association recommends testing for type 2 diabetes in children age 10 and older who are overweight and have at least two other risk factors.
Using data from the third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, the authors estimated the number of adolescents who would qualify for testing as recommended.
Of the 199 who met the criteria for testing, one adolescent had undiagnosed diabetes and four others had impaired fasting glucose.
These recommendations lead to testing a large number of children while offering a rather small yield.
Type 2 diabetes is a devastating disease with lifelong complications, and control efforts are badly needed, especially for children.
Rather than challenging the need for testing children whose clinical features strongly suggest type 2 diabetes, the authors urge refining the criteria.
Efforts at early detection may not be cost-effective and may divert resources away from other cost-effective interventions.
Fagot-Campagna A, Saaddine JB, Flegal KM, Beckles GL. Diabetes, impaired fasting glucose, and elevated HbA1c in U.S. adolescents: The third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24(5):834-837.
Using population-based data, the authors estimated the prevalence of diabetes, impaired fasting glucose, and elevated HbA1c levels in U.S. adolescents.
The third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (1988-94) examined a representative sample of the U.S. population, which included 2,867 adolescents age 12 to 19 years who had serum glucose measured.
Of the 13 adolescents in the sample who were considered to have diabetes, nine reported using insulin, two reported using oral agents only, and two did not report any treatment but had high glucose levels.
Four of these cases (31 percent of the sample with diabetes) were considered to have type 2 diabetes.
The estimated prevalence of diabetes (all types) per 100 adolescents was 0.41 percent.
National data reflect the presence of type 2 diabetes in U.S. adolescents, but the survey sample size was not large enough to obtain precise prevalence estimates because of the relatively low prevalence.
Fujimoto WY.
The importance of insulin resistance in the pathogenesis of type 2 diabetes mellitus.
American Journal of Medicine.
2000;108(suppl 6a):9S-14S.
Many patients with type 2 diabetes have hyperglycemia resulting from deficiencies in both insulin secretion and insulin action (i.e., beta-cell dysfunction, insulin resistance).
Insulin resistance stems from genetic and environmental causes.
Enhanced insulin secretion can compensate for insulin resistance, and enhanced insulin sensitivity can mask defects in beta-cell function.
However, insulin resistance is essential to the development of the majority of cases of type 2 diabetes.
Type 2 diabetes already has reached epidemic proportions worldwide.
By 2025, an estimated 300 million people will have diabetes, most of whom will inhabit China, India, and the United States.
Studies
5
have demonstrated the complex interrelationship of hyperinsulinemia, obesity, and free fatty acids with beta-cell dysfunction, insulin resistance, and the development of type 2 diabetes.
Lifestyle changes and medications can improve insulin sensitivity, insulin secretion, and glucose utilization and reduce the prevalence of type 2 diabetes.
Glaser NS.
Non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus in childhood and adolescence.
Pediatric Endocrinology.
1997;44(2):307-337.
Most subtypes of type 2 diabetes mellitus that occur in childhood are uncommon, but some, such as early onset of "classic" type 2 diabetes, seem to be increasing in prevalence.
This observed increase is thought to be caused by sedentary lifestyles and increased prevalence of obesity.
In adults, hyperglycemia frequently exists for years before a diagnosis of type 2 diabetes is made and treatment begun.
Children are frequently asymptomatic at the time of diagnosis; therefore, screening for this disorder should be considered for children of high-risk ethnic populations with a strong family history of type 2 diabetes with obesity or signs of hyperinsulinism, such as acanthosis nigricans.
Even for children in these high-risk groups who do not yet manifest hyperglycemia, primary care providers can encourage lifestyle modifications that might delay or prevent onset of type 2 diabetes.
Grey M, Boland EA, Davidson M, Li J, Tamborlane WV. Coping skills training for youth with diabetes mellitus has long-lasting effects on metabolic control and quality of life.
Journal of Pediatrics.
2000;137(1):107-113.
This study explored whether initial effects on metabolic control and quality of life associated with a behavioral intervention combined with intensive diabetes management (IDM) can be sustained over 1 year in youth implementing intensive therapy regimens.
Seventy-seven patients (43 females, 95 percent white), age 12 to 20, electing to initiate IDM were randomly assigned to one of two groups: with or without coping skills training (CST).
After 1 year, CST subjects had lower glycosylated hemoglobin, better diabetes and medical self-efficacy, and less impact of diabetes on their quality of life than youth receiving IDM alone.
In males, CST did not affect adverse outcomes of IDM hypoglycemia, diabetic ketoacidosis, and weight gain, but CST decreased the incidence of weight gain and hypoglycemia in females.
The addition of behavioral intervention to IDM in adolescence resulted in improved metabolic control and quality of life over 1 year.
Guazzarotti L, Bartolotta E, Chiarelli F. Maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY): A new challenge for pediatric diabetologists.
Journal of Pediatric Endocrinology 
1997;12(4):487-497.
The differential diagnosis of hyperglycemia in childhood and adolescence must consider early-onset type 2 diabetes, defined as maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY).
To date, mutations in genes of five proteins have been shown to cause MODY: glucokinase (MODY2), hepatic nuclear factor-1 alpha (MODY3), hepatic nuclear factor4 alpha (MODY1), insulin promoter factor 1 (MODY4), and hepatic nuclear factor-1 beta
6
(MODY5).
Other MODY genes still await elucidation.
Clinical and metabolic heterogeneity of these subtypes of type 2 diabetes need to be defined, as deficiency of each factor has its own phenotype.
Pediatric diabetologists should be aware of the increasing importance of MODY as a possible cause of hyperglycemia in children and adolescents.
Such awareness will allow for early diagnosis of these metabolic conditions and for appropriate followup and treatment.
Hathout EH, Thomas W, El-Shahawy M, Nahab F, Mace JW. Diabetic autoimmune markers in children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes.
Pediatrics.
2001;107(6):E102.
Incidence of type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents is increasing.
This study identified clinical and autoimmune characteristics of type 2 diabetes in a pediatric population.
The authors compared children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes to children with type 1 diabetes.
Ethnic background was predominantly Hispanic in the type 2 group and predominantly white in the type 1 group.
Body mass index was significantly higher in the group with type 2 diabetes.
No significant correlation was shown among any of the diabetes antibodies and obesity, presence of acanthosis nigricans, or family history of diabetes.
The frequency of thyroid antibodies was not significantly different between the two groups.
Daily insulin requirements 1 year after diagnosis were significantly lower in type 2 diabetes.
The authors concluded that absence of diabetes autoimmune markers is not a prerequisite for the diagnosis of type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents.
Hattersley AT. Diagnosis of maturity-onset diabetes of the young in the pediatric diabetes clinic.
Journal of Pediatric Endocrinology 
2000;13(6):1411-1417.
Diagnosis of pediatric diabetes traditionally is not considered a diagnostic specialty.
However, considerable heterogeneity in the etiology of diabetes is seen among children and adolescents, making the recognition of discrete subgroups of diabetes important for determining prognosis and appropriate treatment.
The subgroups that result in type 2 diabetes in children include the "honeymoon" phase of type 1 diabetes, type 2 diabetes, genetic syndromes accompanied by diabetes, and maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY).
The relative prevalence of these different subgroups depends on the population being studied.
In pediatric clinics in the United Kingdom, where most patients are Caucasian, MODY is more than 10 times more prevalent than type 2 diabetes.
However, type 2 diabetes would predominate in a clinic where most children are from populations with a high prevalence of this condition (e.g., Asian Indians).
MODY comprises two discrete clinical syndromes: glucokinase diabetes and transcription factor diabetes.
Jones KL. Non-insulin-dependent diabetes in children and adolescents: The therapeutic challenge.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;37:103-110.
Presented data compare type 2 diabetes and type 1 diabetes in youth.
Children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes were predominantly Mexican American, presented less frequently in ketoacidosis, had a greater frequency of family history of diabetes, had
7
higher body mass indexes, and had higher frequency of acanthosis nigricans.
This article discusses logistical, social, and cultural challenges facing physicians treating children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes and briefly reviews treatment options for type 2 diabetes in youth.
Libman I, Arslanian SA.
Type II diabetes mellitus: No longer just adults.
Pediatric Annals.
1999;28(9):589-593.
Type 2 diabetes is no longer exclusively a disease of adults.
Health care professionals and agencies must gain a better understanding of (1) the epidemiology of type 2 diabetes in childhood; (2) the phenotypic, biochemical, metabolic, and autoimmune characteristics at diagnosis and during the course of the disease; (3) therapeutic modalities; (4) screening of high-risk populations; and (5) prevention strategies.
Controlling type 2 diabetes will be one of the challenges in pediatric diabetes in the 21st century.
Miglani S, Sood A, Shah P. Self-reported attitude and behavior of young diabetics about discussing their disease.
Diabetes Research and Clinical Practice.
2000;48(l):9-13.
This study surveyed 47 young patients with diabetes (onset before age 30) regarding their type of treatment, health status information about diabetes, and assumptions and experiences regarding certain psychosocial behavior.
A total of 59.6 percent subjects said they could disclose everything about their disease to their friends and acquaintances, 27 percent felt they could divulge only partial information, and 12.8 percent did not want to discuss their disease with friends and acquaintances.
One of the fears expressed about not discussing their disease was that people would treat them differently or perceive them as sick.
However, only 38 percent experienced such a change in the behavior of their acquaintances.
Seventy-three percent had received unsolicited advice from others about food and dietary restrictions, and 43 percent had received instructions from acquaintances to stop all treatment and shift to household remedies.
National Center for Chronic Disease Prevention and Health Promotion.
Epidemiology of type 2 diabetes mellitus among North American children and adolescents.
Diabetes Projects: Children and Diabetes.
Available at: www.cdc.gov/diabetes/projects/cda2.htm.
Updated July 2001.
Accessed August 6, 2001.
This review of current knowledge of type 2 diabetes among children and adolescents in North America assesses the magnitude of the disease and its public health importance.
Children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes generally were age 10 to 19, were obese, were insulin-resistant, and had a strong family history for type 2 diabetes and acanthosis nigricans.
American Indian youths had the highest prevalence of type 2 diabetes: Among those age 15 to 19, the current prevalence per 1,000 was 50.9 for Pima Indians from Arizona, 4.5 for all U.S.
American Indians, and 2.3 for Canadian First Nation people.
The epidemics of obesity, the low level of physical activity among young people, and exposure to diabetes in utero may be major contributors to the increase in type 2 diabetes during childhood and adolescence.
8
National Center for Chronic Disease Prevention and Health Promotion.
Reference documents on type 2 diabetes in children.
Diabetes Projects: Children and Diabetes.
Available at: www.cdc.gov/diabetes/projects/ref.htm.
Updated July 2001.
Accessed August 6, 2001.
This bibliography lists 27 reference documents on type 2 diabetes in children.
Most of the articles examine the prevalence, epidemiology, diagnosis, or treatment of type 2 diabetes in special populations, including American Indians, Canadian Indians, Mexican Americans and other Hispanics, Japanese people, African Americans, and Alaska Natives.
National Center for Chronic Disease Prevention and Health Promotion.
Special focus: Diabetes.
Chronic Disease Notes 
1999;12(2):1-28.
Available at: www.cdc.gov/nccdphp/cdsum99.pdf.
Updated July 2001.
Accessed August 6, 2001.
This newsletter examines the rising threat of type 2 diabetes among U.S. children, controlling the growing burden of diabetes, the objectives and next steps of the National Diabetes Education Program (NDEP), NDEP partnerships, NDEP's funding of six national minority organizations to support its activities, NDEP media campaigns, and the importance of annual flu shots for people with diabetes.
Other articles describe the involvement of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's (CDC's) Division of Diabetes Translation in projects in Egypt, India, Taiwan, the Caribbean, and U.S.-Mexico border; CDC's 5-year study--Translating Research Into Action for Diabetes (TRIAD)-- to evaluate the health of people with diabetes, the quality of care they receive, and the degree to which they self-manage their disease.
Also covered is CDC support for Stateand territorial-based diabetes control programs, including programs in Florida, West Virginia, Maine, Utah, and Minnesota.
Nesmith JD. Type 2 diabetes mellitus in children and adolescents.
Pediatrics in Review.
2001;22(5):147-152.
Type 2 diabetes is becoming increasingly common among children and adolescents.
Once considered a disease of adults, it is now almost as common as type 1 diabetes in some pediatric populations.
Type 2 diabetes should be considered in any child who presents with hyperglycemia, but particularly in the child who is obese, has a family history of diabetes, has nonketotic hyperglycemia, or has signs of insulin resistance (e.g., acanthosis nigricans).
A thorough evaluation of the child's overall health, glycemic control, and social and family issues should guide treatment.
A cooperative relationship between the primary care practitioner and a diabetes care team optimizes adherence to individualized treatment.
Ortega-Rodriguez E, Levy-Marchal C, Guillermine S, Polak M. Beta cell autoimmunity in a child with M.O.D.Y. (maturity onset diabetes in the young).
Diabetes 
2001;27(1):59-61.
The authors present the case of a well-characterized maturity-onset diabetes in the young (MODY) type 2 diabetes family in which one of the children associated beta cell
9
autoimmunity and an HLA DQB1 at risk for immune-mediated type 1 diabetes.
The search for autoantibodies against beta cell should be considered in cases of genetically defined form of diabetes to exclude the possibility of a concomitant risk to develop type 1 diabetes.
Owada M, Nitadori Y, Kitagawa T. Treatment of NIDDM in youth.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;37:117-122.
This study examined the characteristics of 20 children in Japan with type 2 diabetes who required therapy with an oral hypoglycemic agent.
A family history of type 2 diabetes was present in 55 percent.
None had islet cell antibodies or glutamic acid decarboxylase antibodies.
Tolbutamide was the drug of choice; glibenclamide was introduced if glycemic control was not obtained after 2 to 3 months of tolbutamide therapy.
Seven of the patients eventually required insulin therapy.
The authors concluded that adherence is the most important factor for the treatment of type 2 diabetes, and a good relationship among the patient, the pediatrician, and the dietitian should be maintained to encourage good glycemic control.
Pinhas-Hamiel O, Dolan LM, Daniels SR, Standiford D, Khourv PR, Zeitler P. Increased incidence of non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus among adolescents.
Journal of Pediatrics.
1996;128:608-615.
This study explored whether increased diagnosis of type 2 diabetes has accompanied increased obesity in the pediatric population, as it has among adults.
The number of patients age 0 to 19 diagnosed with type 2 diabetes rose from 4 percent of new diagnoses before 1992 to 16 percent in 1994.
In 1994, type 2 diabetes accounted for 33 percent of diabetes diagnoses among patients age 10 to 19.
The incidence of type 2 diabetes in adolescents in Greater Cincinnati increased tenfold from 1982 to 1994.
Sixty-five percent of patients had a first-degree relative with type 2 diabetes.
At presentation, 21 percent of the patients had had a diagnosis of at least one other condition associated with obesity.
Obesity and strong family histories of type 2 diabetes are important risk factors.
Because type 2 diabetes leads to long-term morbidity, prevention of obesity and early identification of overt disease are critical.
Pinhas-Hamiel O, Standiford D, Hamiel D, Dolan LM, Cohen R, Zeitler PS.
The type 2 family: A setting for development and treatment of adolescent type 2 diabetes mellitus.
Archives of Pediatrics 
1999;153(10):1063-1067.
This study identified physical, behavioral, and environmental features of adolescents (age 11 to 17) with type 2 diabetes and their families to define the involvement of known risk factors and to define a profile of at-risk individuals.
The sample comprised 42 subjects from 11 families with an adolescent with previously diagnosed type 2 diabetes.
The authors found that adolescents with previously diagnosed type 2 diabetes are obese and that the incidence of diagnosed and undiagnosed type 2 diabetes or of insulin resistance in their families is striking.
Subjects' lifestyles were characterized by high fat intake, minimal physical activity, and a high incidence of binge eating.
Families of adolescents
10
with type 2 diabetes appear to share many anthropometric and lifestyle risk factors.
Treatment programs for adolescents with type 2 diabetes need to address the lifestyle and health habits of the entire family.
Pinhas-Hamiel O, Zeitler P.
The importance of a name.
New England Journal of Medicine.
1997;340:1418-1421.
This case study describes a 16-year-old African American female who presented to the emergency room with increased thirst, frequent urination, fatigue, and a significant recent weight loss, all signs of type 1 diabetes.
However, a combination of obesity, hypertension, acanthosis nigricans, large insulin requirement, negative antibody tests, and family history of diabetes suggested type 2 diabetes.
Clinical signs can help distinguish between type 1 and type 2 diabetes.
Nearly all young patients with type 2 diabetes are obese, compared to only 25 percent of patients with type 1 diabetes.
Adolescents with type 2 diabetes commonly have acanthosis nigricans and hypertension, conditions rarely seen in type 1 diabetes.
Combined, these clinical signs strongly suggest type 2 diabetes.
A specific diagnosis is essential.
Although insulin replacement is essential in treating type 1 diabetes, the ultimate goal of treating type 2 diabetes is to correct the underlying insulin resistance through weight reduction, exercise, and medications.
Pinhas-Hamiel O, Zeitler P.
A weighty problem--Diagnosis and treatment of type 2 diabetes in adolescents.
Diabetes Spectrum.
1997;10(4):292-298.
The diagnosis of type 2 diabetes among adolescents is increasing in the United States.
These adolescents are characterized by morbid obesity, sedentary lifestyle, and high caloric intake--risk factors very similar to those seen in adults with type 2 diabetes.
Successful treatment of these patients requires consideration of the underlying causes of the disease and a family-oriented approach.
Ponder SW, Sullivan S, McBath G. Type 2 diabetes in teens.
Diabetes Spectrum.
2000;13(2):95-105.
This comprehensive discussion of type 2 diabetes in teenagers reviews definitions of type 1 and forms of non-type 1 diabetes, the epidemiology of type 2 diabetes in teens, and the scope of related problems.
Hypertension, dyslipidemia, and menstrual irregularities are all known consequences of chronic hyperinsulinemia.
Secondary morbidities include morbid obesity, orthopedic problems, depression, and obstructive sleep apnea.
The recognition of acanthosis nigricans as a proxy for insulin resistance has given rise to the use of this dermatological condition as a tool for identifying patients at risk for developing type 2 diabetes.
Management considerations for teens with type 2 diabetes are described, including diabetes self-management education, medical nutrition therapy, exercise prescription, pharmacological treatment, and psychosocial considerations.
Prevention and complications of type 2 diabetes also are addressed.
11
Quinn L. Type 2 diabetes: Epidemiology, pathophysiology, and diagnosis.
Nursing Clinics of North America.
2001;36(2):175-192.
Type 2 diabetes is a major global health problem that affects more than 124 million individuals worldwide.
In the United States, type 2 diabetes affects 90 percent of the 15.6 million persons with diabetes, of which about half remain undiagnosed.
Type 2 diabetes is increasing, especially among minority populations.
Normally associated with older adults, type 2 diabetes is becoming more common in children and adolescents.
A variety of environmental and genetic factors seem to mediate the development of type 2 diabetes.
This article explores the epidemiology, pathophysiology, and diagnosis of type 2 diabetes and identifies risk factors associated with the development of this disorder.
Rosenbloom AL, Joe JR, Young RS, Winter WE. Emerging epidemic of type 2 diabetes in youth.
Diabetes Care.
1999;22(2):345-354.
Type 2 diabetes is increasing in youth, especially in minority populations and obese persons.
Among Japanese schoolchildren, type 2 diabetes is seven times more common than type 1, and its incidence has increased more than 30-fold over the past 20 years, concomitant with changing eating patterns and increasing obesity rates.
Insulin resistance predicts the development of diabetes in Pima Indians, offspring of parents with type 2 diabetes, and other high-risk populations.
African American children have greater insulin responses during glucose tolerance testing than do whites.
Preventing and treating type 2 diabetes in youth is a daunting challenge because of the enormous behavioral influence, difficulty in reversing obesity, and typical nonadherence in this age group.
The full effect of this emerging epidemic of type 2 diabetes in youth, especially among minorities, will be felt as these children become adults and develop the long-term complications of diabetes.
Rostler S. Medical group urges greater screening for diabetes.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24:S21S24.
Although the actual criteria for diagnosing diabetes have not changed, the American Diabetes Association is urging physicians to be more mindful when examining patients.
Doctors should ask obese children and adolescents if they have a parent or relative with diabetes.
Until recently, type 2 diabetes was known as adult-onset diabetes because it occurred mostly in adults older than age 50, but the number of children and adolescents diagnosed with the disorder is rising steadily.
According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, type 2 diabetes may account for 8 to 45 percent of new cases of childhood diabetes.
Type 2 diabetes is related to obesity and other lifestyle factors and sometimes can be controlled with diet and exercise.
Rostler S. More children diagnosed with type 2 diabetes.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24:S21-S24.
Burgeoning rates of obesity among young people, brought on by declining levels of physical activity and fast-food diets, seem to be fueling rates of type 2 diabetes in U.S. children, a disease once common only in those older than age 50.
The increase in obesity
12
is probably the culprit behind childhood cases.
Overweight people are more likely to lose their sensitivity to insulin.
Genetic factors also play a role, as African Americans, Hispanics, Native Americans, and some Asians have a higher risk than white Americans.
Diet and exercise can improve insulin sensitivity and help regulate blood glucose in people with type 2 diabetes.
However few medications have been tested on, and therefore shown to be safe for, children.
Scott CR, Smith JM, Cradock MM, Pihoker C. Characteristics of youth-onset noninsulindependent diabetes mellitus and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus at diagnosis.
Pediatrics.
1997;100:84-91.
This study compared Arkansas youths with type 2 diabetes with similar patients with type 1 diabetes.
Among the group with type 2 diabetes, 74 percent were African American, compared to only 18 percent of patients with type 1 diabetes.
Ninety-six percent of youths with type 2 diabetes and 24 percent of youths with type 1 diabetes had a body mass index greater than or equal to the 85th percentile.
Of those with type 2 diabetes, more than 30 percent presented with hypertension and more than 25 percent presented with diabetic ketoacidosis.
Acanthosis nigricans was documented in 86 percent of youths with type 2 diabetes and 0 percent of patients with type 1 diabetes.
Physical characteristics such as obesity, acanthosis nigricans, and hypertension on examination of any youth with new-onset diabetes should raise suspicion of type 2 diabetes.
Silverstein JH, Rosenbloom AL. Treatment of type 2 diabetes mellitus in children and adolescents.
Journal of Pediatric Endocrinology 
2000;13(6):1403-1409.
Treatment of type 2 diabetes aims to decrease insulin resistance and increase insulin secretion.
A survey of 130 pediatric endocrinology practices in the United States and Canada indicated that 48 percent of children with type 2 diabetes were treated with insulin and 44 percent with at least one oral hypoglycemic agent (OHA).
In three Florida diabetes centers, 50 percent of children with type 2 diabetes were treated with OHA.
Treatment is based on symptoms at presentation.
Patients identified during routine testing are often treated with exercise and diet alone.
Those who are mildly symptomatic at onset are often started on OHA.
Patients with substantial ketosis, ketoacidosis, or markedly elevated blood glucose levels are initially treated with insulin, followed by tapering of dose and addition of OHA after blood glucose is controlled and symptoms subside.
Treatment is currently based on clinical experience with adults.
Controlled clinical trials in children are essential.
Sunehag AL, Treuth MS, Toffolo G, Butte NF, Cobelli C, Bier DM, Haymond MW. Glucose production, glucogenesis, and insulin sensitivity in children and adolescents: An evaluation of their reproducibility.
Pediatric Research.
2001;50(1):115-123.
The prevalence of overweight and obese children has doubled, and the incidence of type 2 diabetes in children has increased fourfold during the past several decades.
This study provided new data on energy expenditure and glucose, lipid, and protein metabolism in
13
nonobese, healthy children and adolescents.
The authors evaluated the reproducibility of these data and performed power calculations for metabolic studies.
Trissler RJ. Type 2 diabetes on the rise in children: Is the American lifestyle coming home to roost? Journal of the American Dietetic Association.
1999;99(11):1354.
Type 2 diabetes is on the rise among children in the United States.
Children affected by this disease may develop serious associated health risks--including premature heart disease, stroke, blindness, kidney disease, and amputation--as young as age 25 or 30.
Hispanic, American Indian, African American, and Pacific Islander adolescents are at greater risk than white adolescents of developing type 2 diabetes.
Forty-five to eighty percent of children with this disease have at least one family member with the disease.
Obesity plays the biggest role, in part the result of too much television watching, too many calories consumed, and too little exercise.
Up to 85 percent of children with type 2 diabetes are overweight at the time of diagnosis.
Dietitians can help fight the increase in type 2 diabetes by advocating physical activity in schools and coupling recommendations for more healthful eating with recommendations for physical activity.
Velho G, Froguel P. Genetic metabolic and clinical characteristics of maturity onset diabetes of the young.
European Journal of Endocrinology.
1998;138:233-239.
Maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY) is a genetically and clinically heterogeneous subtype of type 2 diabetes characterized by early onset, autosomal dominant inheritance, and a primary defect in insulin secretion.
To date, three MODY genes have been identified on chromosomes 20q (MODY1/hepatic nuclear factor [HNF]4alpha), 7p (MODY2/glucokinase), and 12q (MODY3/HNF-1alpha).
Mutations in MODY2/glucokinase result in mild chronic hyperglycemia as a result of reduced pancreatic beta-cell responsiveness to glucose, decreased net accumulation of hepatic glycogen, and increased hepatic gluconeogenesis after meals.
In contrast, MODY1 and MODY3 are characterized by severe insulin secretory defects and by major hyperglycemia associated with microvascular complications.
Genetic studies seem to exclude a major role of the three known MODY genes in susceptibility to the more common late-onset type 2 diabetes, but leave unresolved whether they may have a minor role in a polygenic context or an important role in particular populations.
Warram JH, Martin BC, Krolewski AS, Soeldner JS, Kahn CR. Slow glucose removal rate and hyperinsulinemia precede the development of type II diabetes in the offspring of diabetic parents.
Annals of Internal Medicine.
1990;113:909-915.
This cohort analytic study examined whether insulin resistance or insulin deficiency is primary in the pathogenesis of type 2 diabetes.
The sample comprised 155 normal offspring, age 16 to 60, of two parents with type 2 diabetes and 186 normal control subjects in the same age range with no family history of diabetes.
Sixteen percent of the offspring developed type 2 diabetes.
In multivariate analysis, low blood glucose removal rates and high serum insulin levels independently increased the risk for developing diabetes among the offspring of parents with diabetes.
The authors concluded that one to
14
two decades before type 2 diabetes is diagnosed, reduced glucose clearance is already present.
This reduced clearance is accompanied by compensatory hyperinsulinemia, not hypoinsulinemia, suggesting that the primary defect is in peripheral tissue response to insulin and glucose, not in the pancreatic beta cell.
Winter WE, Nakamura M, House DV. Monogenic diabetes mellitus in youth.
The MODY syndromes.
Endocrinology and Metabolism Clinics of North America.
1999;28(4):765-785.
Classic maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY) occurs predominantly in Caucasians, presents before age 25, is nonketotic, and generally does not require insulin.
MODY causes fewer than 5 percent of childhood diabetes in Caucasians.
Atypical diabetes mellitus (ADM), a MODY subtype, occurs in about 10 percent of African Americans with youth-onset diabetes.
In contrast to MODY in Caucasians, ADM presents clinically as acute-onset diabetes often associated with weight loss, ketosis, and even diabetic ketoacidosis.
About half of patients with ADM are obese.
At onset, ADM cannot be distinguished clinically from type 1 diabetes, but months to years following diagnosis, a non-insulin-dependent clinical course develops that clearly differs from type 1 diabetes.
Patients with MODY do not usually require long-term insulin for survival.
Diagnostic confusion can lead to inappropriate management and patient expectations.
MODY can be diagnosed through careful review of the patient's clinical course, severity of hyperglycemia, and family history.
Winter WE, Silverstein JH. Molecular and genetic bases for maturity onset diabetes of youth.
Current Opinion in Pediatrics.
2000;12(4)L388-393.
Maturity-onset diabetes of youth (MODY) occurs in children, adolescents, and young adults as a non-insulin-requiring form of diabetes inherited as an autosomal dominant trait.
MODY in whites presents subtly similar to type 2 diabetes in adults.
In contrast, atypical diabetes, a MODY variant that occurs in young African Americans, presents as an acute-onset form of diabetes.
Months to years after diagnosis, atypical diabetes reverts to a non-insulin-requiring course similar to MODY in whites.
Identified molecular causes for MODY include mutations in four transcription factors and mutations in one enzyme (glucokinase).
Transcription factors regulate gene expression within cells.
Mutations in hepatocyte nuclear factor (HNF)-4alpha, HNF-1alpha, insulin promoter factor-1 and HNF-1beta, respectively, cause MODY1, MODY3, MODY4, and MODY5.
MODY2 is caused by glucokinase mutations.
Although testing for MODY mutations is only available in research laboratories, clinicians often can diagnose MODY through a careful history and review of the patient's clinical course.
15
Risk Factors General Arslanian SA.
Type 2 diabetes mellitus in children: Pathophysiology and risk factors.
Journal of Pediatric Endocrinology 
2001;13(6):1385-1394.
Type 2 diabetes has been considered rare in the pediatric population.
However, the last decade has witnessed a disturbing upswing in the rate of diagnosis of type 2 diabetes in children, mirroring the increasing obesity rates in childhood.
The pathophysiology of type 2 diabetes discussed in this article focuses on the delicate balance between insulin sensitivity and insulin secretion.
Risk factors for youth-onset type 2 diabetes are presented, with careful evaluation of their impact on insulin sensitivity versus insulin secretion.
Donaghue KC, Fung A, Hing S, Fairchild J, King J, Chain A, Howard NJ, Silink M.
The effect of prepubertal diabetes duration on diabetes.
Microvascular complications in early and late adolescence.
Diabetes Care.
1997;20:77-80.
This study examined the significance of prepubertal diabetes duration in the development of diabetic microvascular complications in adolescents.
Study A compared complications in 38 prepubertal and 140 pubertal subjects age 10 to 14 and diabetes duration (3 to 12 years) to determine if the absence of puberty itself confers a lower risk of complications.
Study B examined the importance of prepubertal and pubertal diabetes duration in 193 older adolescents (age 15 to 22) with prepubertal onset of diabetes.
No relationship with duration was found for elevated albumin excretion.
Prepubertal subjects with diabetes did not have less retinopathy or elevated albumin excretion compared with pubertal subjects of the same age.
Prepubertal diabetes duration is significantly related to the presence of retinopathy in adolescents.
Ellis KJ. Body composition of a young, multiethnic, male population.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
1997;66:1323-1331.
This study established the range of total body-composition values for a young, multiethnic, healthy male population (age 3 to 18) by using dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA).
Bone mineral content and lean tissue mass were higher in African Americans than in whites, but no difference was evident between the white and Hispanic groups.
Hispanic males had higher body fat values than white males, who generally had higher values than African American males.
The study derived ethnicspecific equations for the prediction of body composition as a function of age, weight, and height.
The author compared results for white males in this study with DXA-derived reference data reported in other countries for young white males, concluding that reference values of total body composition for young healthy males need to be ethnicspecific.
16
Ellis KJ, Abrams SA, Wong WW. Body composition of a young, multiethnic female population.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
1997;65:724-731.
This study established the range of body-composition values for a young, multiethnic female population (age 3 to 18) by using dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA).
Bone mineral content and lean tissue mass were higher in African Americans than in whites, but no significant difference was evident between whites and Hispanics.
Hispanic and African American females had higher percentage fat values than white females.
Ethnic-specific equations for body composition as a function of age, weight, and height are given.
In addition, the authors compared results for white females in the present study with DXA-derived body-composition data for reference populations in other countries, concluding that reference values of total body composition for young females need to be ethnic-specific.
Gortmaker SL, Cheung LW, Peterson KE, Chomitz G, Cradle JH, Dart H, Fox MK, Bullock RB, Sobol AM, Colditz G, Field AE, Laird N. Impact of a school-based interdisciplinary intervention on diet and physical activity among urban primary school children: Eat Well and Keep Moving.
Archives of Pediatrics 
1999;153:975-983.
This field trial evaluated the impact of a school-based interdisciplinary health behavior intervention on diet and physical activity among public school children in grades 4 and 5 in Baltimore.
Over 2 years, classroom teachers taught the Eat Well and Keep Moving Program in math, science, language arts, and social studies classes.
Materials provided links to school food services and families and offered training and wellness programs for teachers and other staff.
Intervention materials focused on decreasing consumption of high-fat foods, increasing fruit and vegetable intake, reducing television viewing, and increasing physical activity.
Compared with control schools, students in the intervention schools reduced percentages of total energy from fat and saturated fat and increased fruit and vegetable intake, vitamin C intake, and fiber consumption.
Television viewing was marginally reduced.
The Eat Well and Keep Moving Program was effective in improving dietary intake of students and reducing television viewing.
Gortmaker SL, Peterson KRD, Wiecha J, Sobol AM, Dixit S, Fox MK, Laird N. Reducing obesity via a school-based interdisciplinary intervention among youth: Planet Health.
Archives of Pediatrics 
1999;153:409-418.
An ethnically diverse group of sixth- to eighth-grade students in Massachusetts public schools participated in a school-based interdisciplinary intervention for 2 years.
Classroom teachers included Planet Health sessions within existing curricula in four major subjects and physical education.
Sessions focused on decreasing television viewing, decreasing consumption of high-fat foods, increasing fruit and vegetable intake, and increasing moderate and vigorous physical activity.
Compared with girls in the control schools, the prevalence of obesity decreased among girls in intervention schools, with no differences found among boys.
Greater remission of obesity occurred among intervention girls versus control girls.
The intervention reduced television hours among both girls and boys and increased fruit and vegetable consumption and resulted in a
17
smaller increment in total energy intake among girls.
Planet Health decreased obesity among female students, indicating a promising school-based approach to reducing obesity among youth.
Luepker RV, Perry CL, McKinlay SM, Nader PR, Parcel GS, Stone EJ, Webber LS, Elder JP, Feldman HA, Johnson CC, Kelder SH, Wu M. Outcomes of a field trial to improve children's dietary patterns and physical activity: The Child and Adolescent Trial for Cardiovascular Health (CATCH).
Journal of the American Medical Association.
1996;275:768-776.
This randomized, controlled field trial assessed outcomes of health behavior interventions, focusing on the elementary school environment, classroom curricula, and home programs, for the primary prevention of cardiovascular disease.
The sample comprised 5,106 initially third-grade students from ethnically diverse backgrounds in 96 public elementary schools located in California, Louisiana, Minnesota, and Texas.
The 56 intervention schools participated in a 3-year intervention including school food service modifications, enhanced physical education, and classroom health curricula; 28 of these schools also received family education.
Forty control schools received no intervention.
The Child and Adolescent Trial for Cardiovascular Health (CATCH) intervention significantly modified the fat content of school lunches, increased the intensity of physical activity in physical education classes, and improved eating and physical activity behaviors in children during 3 school years.
Blood pressure, body size, and cholesterol measures did not differ significantly between treatment groups.
Nader PR, Stone EJ, Lytle LA, Perry CL, Osganian SK, Kelder S, Webber LS, Elder JP, Montgomery D, Feldman HA, Wu M, Johnson C, Parcel GS, Luepker RV. Three-year maintenance of improved diet and physical activity: The CATCH cohort.
Archives of Pediatrics and Adolescent Medicine.
1999;153:695-704.
This study assessed differences through grade 8 in diet, physical activity, and related health indicators of students who participated in the Child and Adolescent Trial for Cardiovascular Health (CATCH) from grades 3 through 5.
At grade 5, self-reported daily energy intake from fat remained the same for controls and declined for the intervention group.
Intervention students maintained significantly higher self-reported daily vigorous activity than control students, although the difference steadily declined from grade 5 to grade 8.
Significant differences in favor of the intervention students also persisted at grade 8 for dietary knowledge and dietary intentions, but not for social support for physical activity.
No impact on smoking behavior or stages of contemplating smoking was detected at grade 8.
This 3-year followup without further intervention suggests that the behavioral changes initiated during the elementary school years persisted to early adolescence for self-reported dietary and physical activity behaviors.
Reilly JJ. Assessment of body composition in infants and children.
Nutrition.
1998;14:821-825.
The major applications of pediatric body composition methodology are development and validation of new methods, assessment of growth or nutritional status, public health applications, interpretation of data on energy expenditure, and testing the functional
18
significance of variation in body composition.
Essential to an understanding of the methodology is an appreciation of both the underlying theoretical models (twocomponent and multicomponent models) and the fact that infants and children are not "chemically mature."
The two-component model generates methods that, although limited by variation in the composition of fat-free mass, have acceptable accuracy so long as the method is chosen with care.
Multicomponent models have a more rigorous theoretical basis but require access to techniques that are neither universally available nor always practical for pediatric use.
Bedside methods, notably bioelectrical impedance and skinfold thickness, can provide acceptable accuracy, but the precision of all methods limits their ability to measure changes in body composition.
Trevino RP, Pugh JA, Hernandez AE, Menchaca VD, Ramirez RR, Mendoza M. Bienestar: A diabetes risk-factor prevention program.
Journal of School Health.
1998;68:62-67.
The Bienestar Health Program, a pilot program to prevent diabetes risk factors, targeted fourth-grade Mexican American children.
The primary goals are to decrease the two established risk factors for diabetes--overweight and dietary fats.
Based on social cognitive theory, social systems structure, and culturally relevant material, the health program considers the child's social systems on both its health program and process evaluation.
Learning activities were developed for four social systems that potentially influence children's health behaviors--parent, classroom, school cafeteria, and afterschool care.
Preliminary results show that the Bienestar Health Program significantly decreased dietary fat, increased fruit and vegetable servings, and increased diabetes health knowledge.
Obesity Barlow SE, Dietz WH. Obesity evaluation and treatment: Expert Committee Recommendations.
Pediatrics.
1998;102:e29.
The Maternal and Child Health Bureau of the Health Resources and Services Administration convened a committee of pediatric obesity experts to develop recommendations for physicians, nurse practitioners, and nutritionists to guide the evaluation and treatment of overweight children and adolescents.
Clinicians should be aware of signs of rare exogenous causes of obesity and should screen for obesity complications, including hypertension, dyslipidemias, orthopedic disorders, sleep disorders, gallbladder disease, and insulin resistance.
Conditions that indicate consultation with a pediatric obesity specialist include pseudotumor cerebri, obesityrelated sleep disorders, orthopedic problems, massive obesity, and obesity in children younger than age 2.
Recommendations for treatment evaluation include assessment of patient and family readiness to engage in a weight-management program and focused assessment of diet and physical activity habits.
The primary goal of obesity therapy should be healthy eating and activity.
The committee recommends treatment that begins early, involves the family, and institutes permanent changes in a stepwise manner.
19
Caprio S, Tamborlane WV. Metabolic impact of obesity in childhood.
Endocrinology and Metabolism Clinics of North America.
1999;28(4):731-747.
Obesity among children and adolescents has become the most prevalent nutritional disease in the United States.
A number of studies have demonstrated that the metabolic alterations caused by excess body fat are expressed early in the natural history of obesity.
Such alterations seem clinically important even in children, as evidenced by the recent increase in type 2 diabetes in obese adolescents.
These observations underscore the need for research efforts to develop effective interventions to stem the tide of the childhood obesity epidemic.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Update: Prevalence of overweight among children, adolescents, and adults--1988-1994.
Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report.
1997;46:199202.
Overweight and obese adults are at increased risk for morbidity and mortality associated with many acute and chronic medical conditions, including hypertension, dyslipidemia, coronary heart disease, diabetes, gallbladder disease, respiratory disease, some types of cancer, gout, and arthritis.
In addition, overweight during childhood and adolescence is associated with overweight during adulthood, and previous reports have documented an increase in the prevalence of overweight among children, adolescents, and adults from 1976-80 to 1988-91.
This report presents data from the 1988-94 National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey to provide the most recent national estimates of overweight among children (age 6 to 11), adolescents (age 12 to 17), and adults (age 20 and older).
The findings indicate that the prevalence of overweight in the United States has continued to increase.
Christoffel KK, Ariza A.
The epidemiology of overweight in children: Relevance for clinical care.
Pediatrics.
1998;101:103-105.
This commentary on childhood obesity purports that the following statements are enough to guide rational efforts to reverse the trend toward ever-higher rates of childhood obesity: (1) Overweight that needs attention can be readily identified.
(2) Current dietary patterns promote overweight.
(3) Current patterns of physical activity promote overweight.
(4) Some children are particularly likely to develop overweight.
(5) For many children, obesity starts in the preschool years.
(6) Prevention is better than treatment.
Future research will need to seek more in-depth information on the whys and hows of childhood overweight.
Crowther NJ, Cameron N, Trusler J, Gray IP. Association between poor glucose tolerance and rapid post natal weight gain in seven-year-old children.
Diabetologia.
1998;41(10):1163-1167.
Several studies have shown that glucose tolerance falls with decreasing birthweight and that people with low birthweight and high body mass index as adults are at greatest risk of developing type 2 diabetes.
No such studies have been carried out in African populations.
The authors investigated the relation between glucose tolerance and
20
birthweight in 152 seven-year-old black South Africans.
Children born with low birthweights but who had high weights at age 7 had higher insulin concentrations and indices of obesity compared with those with low birthweights and low weights at age 7.
Positive correlations existed between weight velocity and body mass index and between weight velocity and insulin resistance.
Thus, low birthweight in conjunction with rapid childhood gains in weight, especially as subcutaneous fat, produces poor glucose tolerance in 7-year-old children and can make them susceptible to developing type 2 diabetes later in life.
Epstein LH, Paluch RA, Gordy CC, Saelens BE, Ernst MM. Problem solving in the treatment of childhood obesity.
Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology.
2000;68(4):717-721.
This study randomized obese children from 67 families to groups that received a 6-month family-based behavioral weight-control program and parent and child problemsolving, child problemsolving, or standard treatment with no additional problemsolving.
The standard group showed larger decreases in body mass index than the parent and child group through 2 years, with significant differences in the percentage of children who showed large changes in body mass index.
Significant statistical and clinical improvements were observed over time in child behavior problems and parental distress.
Parent problemsolving increased in the parent and child condition relative to the other conditions, whereas child problemsolving increased equally in all conditions.
The bulk of evidence suggests that problemsolving did not add to treatment effectiveness beyond the standard family-based treatment.
Epstein LH, Valoski A, Kalarchian MA, McCurley J. Do children lose weight easier than adults: A comparison of child and parent weight changes from six months to ten years.
Obesity Research.
1995;3:411-417.
Recent research has shown weight maintenance for obese preadolescent children over 60and 120-month intervals, whereas studies on adults consistently show they fail to maintain weight loss.
The authors examined differences in percent overweight changes at 6, 60, and 120 months in obese parents and children from 113 families who participated in randomized controlled outcome studies evaluating family-based behavioral treatment.
Children had significantly greater changes in percent overweight than their parents at each time point.
In addition, children were more likely than their parents at each time point to have percent overweight decreases greater than 20 percent, with more than 20 percent of the children and fewer than 1 percent of the parents showing changes this large.
These results suggest possible differences in the efficacy of treating obesity in children versus adults.
Epstein LH, Valoski A, Wing RR, McCurley J. Ten-year followup of behavioral, family-based treatment for obese children.
Journal of the American Medical Association.
1990;264:25192523.
This study examined the effects of behavioral family-based treatment on overweight and growth over 10 years.
Three groups of obese children and their parents received similar
21
diet, exercise, and behavior management training.
However, the child and parent group reinforced parent and child behavior change and weight loss; the child group reinforced child behavior change and weight loss; and the nonspecific control group reinforced families for attendance.
Children in the child and parent group showed significantly greater decreases in overweight after 5 and 10 years than children in the control group.
Children in the child group showed increases in overweight after 5 and 10 years that were midway between those for the child and parent group and the control group and were not significantly different from either.
At 10 years, child height was related strongly to height of the same-sex parent; children were 1.8 centimeters taller than their parents, with no differences in height between groups.
Erickson SJ, Robinson TN, Haydel KF, Killen JD.
Are overweight children unhappy?: Body mass index, depressive symptoms, and overweight concerns in elementary school children.
Archives of Pediatrics 
2000;154(9):931-935.
Overweight children are commonly believed to be unhappy with their weight.
However, population-based data addressing this association are lacking.
This study evaluated the association between obesity and depressive symptoms in a diverse, school-based sample of preadolescent children and examined whether overweight concerns play a role in this association.
Some 868 third-grade students attending 13 public elementary schools in northern California were measured for weight and height and asked to complete selfreport assessments of depressive symptoms and overweight concerns.
This study provides cross-sectional evidence for a relationship between depressive symptoms and body mass index in girls, but not in boys.
This relationship seems to be explained by an excess of overweight concerns.
Assessing overweight concerns may be a useful method to identify those overweight girls who are at highest risk for associated depressive symptoms.
Falkner B, Michel S. Obesity and other risk factors in children.
Ethnicity 
1999;9(2):284-289.
The prevalence of obesity has increased over the past three decades in both children and adults.
When obesity develops in childhood, excess adiposity generally continues into adulthood, and adult obesity with childhood onset is frequently more severe.
Health consequences of adult obesity include greater rates of hypertension, type 2 diabetes, and heart disease.
Risk factors for these adult disorders are detectable in obese children.
Compared to normal-weight children, obese children have higher blood pressure, higher plasma insulin levels, and a more atherogenic lipid pattern.
Thus, characteristic features of Syndrome X, or the insulin-resistant syndrome, can be detected in obese children and adolescents.
Vascular consequences of exposure to these metabolic risk factors beginning in childhood have yet to be completely determined.
However, childhood obesity very likely does contribute significantly to cardiovascular disease.
For these reasons, greater efforts should be mounted to reduce the rising rates.
22
Freemark M, Bursey D.
The effects of metformin on body mass index and glucose tolerance in obese adolescents with fasting hyperinsulinemia and a family history of type 2 diabetes.
Pediatrics.
2001;107(4):E55.
This double-blind, placebo-controlled study examined the effects of metformin on body mass index (BMI), serum leptin, glucose tolerance, and serum lipids in obese adolescents with fasting hyperinsulinemia and a family history of type 2 diabetes.
Metformin decreased BMI in study participants and reduced serum leptin in girls.
In contrast, BMI and serum leptin rose in the placebo group.
Metformin also reduced fasting blood glucose and fasting insulin levels whereas the placebo group experienced a slight rise in fasting glucose levels and no change in fasting insulin levels.
Insulin sensitivity increased slightly in the metformin-treated participants.
Neither group experienced significant changes in glucose effectiveness, hemoglobin A1c, serum lipids, or serum lactate.
Most patients tolerated metformin well.
Early detection and therapy of obese adolescents with a family history of type 2 diabetes may interrupt the cycle of weight gain, complement the effects of dietary and exercise counseling, and reduce the risk of type 2 diabetes.
Hollander P. Strategies for reducing weight to increase insulin sensitivity.
Drug Benefit Trends.
2000;12(suppl A):57-65.
Obesity is associated with type 2 diabetes, heart disease, hypertension, stroke, dyslipidemia, osteoarthritis and degenerative joint disease, sleep apnea, gallbladder disorders, respiratory problems, and malignancy.
A loss of only 5 to 10 percent of baseline weight in obese patients with type 2 diabetes, hypertension, or dyslipidemia can improve glycemic control, decrease blood pressure, and improve the lipid profile.
Successful maintenance of weight loss may ultimately require multiple sequential therapies.
Young TK, Dean HJ, Flett B, Wood-Steiman P. Childhood obesity in a population at high risk for type 2 diabetes.
Journal of Pediatrics.
2000;136(3):365-369.
This cross-sectional screening survey examined the prevalence of obesity and investigated its association with fasting glucose and insulin among children and adolescents in a population at high risk for type 2 diabetes.
All children age 4 to 19 in a remote aboriginal (Ojibwa-Cree) community in northern Manitoba, Canada, were invited to participate, with a response rate of 82 percent (719 children).
The authors found a high prevalence of obesity, which puts children at increased risk of having diabetes or impaired fasting glucose.
Early onset of type 2 diabetes in childhood is increasingly observed in many populations.
Childhood obesity is a strong risk factor.
Early detection and intervention directed at obesity are potential strategies to avert the long-term consequences of type 2 diabetes.
23
Young-Hyman D, Herman LJ, Scott DL, Schlundt DG. Care giver perception of children's obesity-related health risk: A study of African American families.
Obesity Research.
2000;8(3):241-248.
This study examined caregiver perception of children's weight-related health risk in African American families.
Despite the fact that a substantial number of children were obese (57 percent) and super-obese (12 percent), only 44 percent of the caregivers perceived the child's weight to be a potential health problem.
Regression analysis showed that 21 percent of the variance in parental perception of obesity-related health risk could be predicted by child age, body mass index, perception of frame size, and perception of exercise habits.
Reasons for the apparent minimization of child health risk include cultural differences in the acceptance of a large body habitus, lack of knowledge about the connection between childhood obesity and future health risk, and an optimistic bias in the perception of personal health risk.
Nutrition American Academy of Pediatrics, Committee on Nutrition.
Cholesterol in childhood.
Pediatrics.
1998;101:141-147.
This updated statement reviews the scientific justification for the recommendations of dietary changes in all healthy children (a population approach) and a strategy to identify and treat children who are at the highest risk for developing accelerated atherosclerosis in early adult life (an individualized approach).
Although the precise fraction of risk for future coronary heart disease conveyed by elevated cholesterol levels in childhood is unknown, clear epidemiologic and experimental evidence indicates that the risk is significant.
Diet changes that lower fat, saturated fat, and cholesterol intake in children and adolescents can be applied safely and acceptably, resulting in improved plasma lipid profiles that, if carried into adult life, have the potential to reduce atherosclerotic vascular disease.
American Dietetic Association.
Position of the American Dietetic Association: Dietary guidance for healthy children aged 2 to 11 years.
Journal of the American Dietetic Association.
1999;99:93-101.
The American Dietetic Association states that children age 2 to 11 should achieve healthful eating habits and participate in regular physical activity to promote optimal physical and cognitive development, attain a healthful weight, and reduce the risk of chronic disease.
Although the health status of U.S. children has generally improved over the past three decades, the number of children who are overweight more than doubled.
This change has broadened the focus of dietary guidance to address nutrient overconsumption, physical activity patterns, and attainment of optimal health through chronic disease prevention.
This position reviews what U.S. children are eating and explores trends in dietary, food, and nutrient intakes as well as the impact of school meals on children's diets.
Dietary recommendations, guidelines, and the impact of physical
24
activity are also presented.
Specific directions are provided to improve the nutritional well-being of children.
Lindquist CH, Gower BA, Goran MI. Role of dietary factors in ethnic differences in early risk of cardiovascular disease and type 2 diabetes.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
2000;71(3):725-732.
The disparity in the prevalence of cardiovascular disease and type 2 diabetes between African Americans and whites has been well established, and ethnic differences in several risk factors for these diseases are evident in childhood.
This study explored whether dietary factors explain ethnic differences in serum lipids and insulin profiles in children, independent of body composition and social class background.
African American children had lower triacylglycerol, lower insulin sensitivity, and higher acute insulin response than did whites.
After adjustment for social class and total energy intake, consumption of fruit and vegetables was significantly higher, and dairy intake lower, in African American than in white children.
Carbohydrate and fruit intakes were positively associated with insulin sensitivity, and vegetable intake was negatively associated with acute insulin response.
However, neither macronutrient nor food group intake accounted for the ethnic differences in triacylglycerol and acute insulin response.
Marshall JA, Hamman RF, Baxter J. High-fat, low-carbohydrate diet and the etiology of noninsulin-dependent diabetes mellitus: The San Luis Valley Diabetes Study.
American Journal of Epidemiology.
1991;134(6):590-603.
Diet has long been believed to be a strong risk factor for type 2 diabetes.
Animal studies generally support a relation between high-fat diets and development of insulin resistance.
However, conclusive epidemiologic evidence is lacking.
This study further investigated the role of dietary fat and carbohydrate as potential risk factors for the onset of type 2 diabetes by assessing the current diet of 1,317 subjects with no prior diagnosis of diabetes in two southern Colorado counties.
Persons with previously undiagnosed diabetes and impaired glucose tolerance were each compared with confirmed normal controls.
Findings support the hypothesis that high-fat, low-carbohydrate diets are associated with the onset of type 2 diabetes in humans.
Marshall JA, Hoag S, Shetterly S, Hamman RF.
Dietary fat predicts conversion from impaired glucose tolerance to NIDDM: The San Luis Valley Diabetes Study.
Diabetes Care.
1994;17(1):50-56.
The San Luis Valley Diabetes Study examined whether dietary fat intake in people with impaired glucose tolerance predicted subsequent development of type 2 diabetes.
One to three years after baseline, 123 subjects had a repeat oral glucose tolerance test.
The mean percentage of energy eaten as fat was 43.4 percent in 20 people subsequently developing type 2 diabetes compared with 40.6 percent in 43 people who still had impaired glucose tolerance and 38.9 percent in 60 subjects who subsequently reverted to normal glucose tolerance.
An increase in fat intake of 40 grams per day was associated with an increase in risk of type 2 diabetes of 3.4-fold adjusted for energy intake, age, sex, ethnicity, and
25
obesity.
The study concluded that fat consumption significantly predicts risk of type 2 diabetes in subjects with impaired glucose tolerance after controlling for obesity and markers of glucose metabolism.
Williams CL, Bollella M, Wynder EL.
A new recommendation for dietary fiber in childhood.
Pediatrics.
1995;96(5 pt 2):985-988.
Consumption of dietary fiber in childhood is associated with important health benefits, especially with respect to promoting normal laxation.
Dietary fiber also may help reduce the future risk of cardiovascular disease, some cancers, and adult-onset diabetes.
Few specific guidelines currently pertain to dietary fiber intake in childhood.
This study reviewed the benefits and risks of dietary fiber in childhood and proposed a safe and effective quantitative recommendation for children.
Based on age, health benefits, and safety concerns, a safe range of dietary fiber intake for children older than age 2 is between age plus 5 and age plus 10 grams per day, even if intake of some vitamins and minerals is marginal.
This recommendation for dietary fiber should provide enough fiber for normal laxation and may help prevent future chronic disease.
Physical Activity Andersen RE, Crespo CJ, Bartlett SJ, Cheskin LJ, Pratt M.
The relationship of physical activity and television watching with body weight and level of fatness among children: Results from the third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey.
Journal of the American Medical Association.
1998;279:938-942.
This study assessed participation in vigorous activity and television watching habits and their relationship to body weight and fatness in U.S. children age 8 to 16.
According to the third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (1988-94), vigorous activity levels are lowest among girls, non-Hispanic blacks, and Mexican Americans.
NonHispanic black children had the highest rates of watching television.
Boys and girls who watch 4 or more hours of television each day had greater body fat and a greater body mass index than did those who watch fewer than 2 hours per day.
Intervention strategies to promote lifelong physical activity among children are needed to stem the adverse health consequences of inactivity.
Ferguson MA, Gutin B, Le N-A, Karp W, Litaker M, Humphries M, Okuyama T, Riggs S, Owens S. Effects of exercise training and its cessation on components of the insulin resistance syndrome in obese children.
International Journal of Obesity.
1999;23:889-895.
This study examined the effect of exercise training (ET) on components of the insulin resistance syndrome in obese children.
Seventy-nine obese but otherwise healthy children were assigned to one of two conditions: 4 months of ET followed by 4 months of no ET, or 4 months of no ET followed by 4 months of ET. ET was offered 5 days per week, 40 minutes per day.
For the 73 children who completed 4 months of ET, the mean attendance was 80 percent and the average heart rate during ET was 157 beats per
26
minute.
The authors concluded that some components (i.e., plasma triglyceride, insulin, percent fat) of the insulin resistance syndrome are improved as a result of 4 months of ET in obese children.
However, the benefits of ET are lost when obese children become less active.
Harsha DW.
The benefits of physical activity in childhood.
American Journal of the Medical Sciences.
1995;310:S109-S113.
Regular physical activity provides substantial benefits in reducing morbidity and mortality from several chronic diseases in adults, particularly cardiovascular disease.
Current studies indicate that today's children are probably less fit than children 20 years ago: they're heavier and tend to be more overweight and sedentary.
The relationships between fitness and cardiovascular risk factors in children are very similar to those in adults.
Children who perform better on standardized fitness tests have more favorable body composition and lipid profiles.
Because cardiovascular risk factors, including obesity, tend to track from childhood to adulthood, programs to increase regular physical activity in children hold promise for reducing adult cardiovascular diseases.
Positive long-term lifestyle changes need to be established early.
Data from the Heart Smart Superkids/Superfit exercise program show that comprehensive school-based health promotion and education interventions can improve fitness in children and ultimately yield improvements in risk factor profiles.
Special Populations General Dabelea D, Pettitt DJ, Jones KL, Arslanian SA.
Type 2 diabetes mellitus in minority children and adolescents.
An emerging problem.
Endocrinology and Metabolism Clinics of North America.
1999;28(4):709-729, viii.
In the past, type 2 diabetes was a disease of adults and considered rare in children and adolescents.
The last decade, however, has seen a disturbing increase in type 2 diabetes in children, particularly adolescents, and the disease affects a greater proportion of minority children.
This article reviews the clinical characteristics of youth with type 2 diabetes, presents the risk factors associated with insulin resistance and type 2 diabetes, discusses treatment options, and projects future directions in research.
The ultimate goal is to raise awareness among health care professionals of this challenging disease.
de Lissovoy G, Ganoczy DA, Ray NF. Relationship of hemoglobin A1c, age of diabetes diagnosis, and ethnicity to clinical outcomes and medical costs in a computer-simulated cohort of persons with type 2 diabetes.
American Journal of Managed Care.
2000;6(5):573-584.
This study projected the impact of maintaining long-term glycemic control--i.e., a sustained reduction in glycosylated hemoglobin (hemoglobin A1c [HbA1c])--on the lifetime incidence and direct medical costs of complications in persons with type 2
27
diabetes.
Across all HbA1c levels, Hispanics had the highest and whites had the lowest complication rates.
With lower maintained HbA1c, the absolute decrease in complication rates was greatest and the reduction in direct medical expenditures was highest among Hispanics (18 percent) compared with African Americans (15 percent) and whites (12 percent).
Complication rates and costs were most dramatically reduced when lower levels of HbA1c were maintained among persons with a younger age at diagnosis.
Maintaining long-term glycemic control reduces complication rates and costs for medical care for all ethnic groups regardless of age at diagnosis.
Relatively greater benefit is achieved by interventions targeting Hispanics and younger, newly diagnosed persons.
Kasim-Karakas SE.
Ethnic differences in the insulin resistance syndrome.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
2000;71:670-671.
According to this study, African American men have a 60-percent higher incidence of diabetes than white men, and African American women have a 100-percent higher incidence than white women.
Furthermore, rates of blindness, renal disease, and amputations are significantly higher in African Americans with diabetes than in others with the disease.
The reasons for the elevated risk of diabetes in this population must be identified, and effective intervention methods must be found to prevent the onset of type 2 diabetes.
African Americans have a high prevalence of obesity, and obesity and diet are commonly assumed to increase the risk of diabetes in this population.
A good diet and treatment of obesity should prevent and even reverse type 2 diabetes.
African American children had higher vegetable and fruit intakes than did white children.
Therefore, traditional thinking about the pathogenesis of diabetes both in African Americans and in general must be reconsidered.
Keenan H, el Deirawi K, Walsh M, Grover V, Alva E, Onyemere K, Lipton R. Are trends in diabetes incidence changing for minority children? Annals of Epidemiology.
2000;10(7):459.
This study contrasted incidence rates and time trends of typical type 1 diabetes with nonautoimmune insulin-resistant type 2 diabetes in minority children (early 2).
Data were obtained on all insulin-treated African American and Hispanic children residing in Chicago and diagnosed between 1985 and 1994.
The authors reviewed and abstracted 739 medical records and interviewed a subset of 195 patients.
The average annual incidence rate was 10.3 per 100,000 population for type 1 diabetes and 3.2 per 100,000 for those with characteristics of early 2 diabetes.
The incidence rate remained static for type 1 diabetes over the 10 years.
The early 2 group experienced an average annual increase of 9.0 percent.
Trends in incidence rates vary between type 1 and early 2 diabetes.
The authors hypothesize that increased incidence of early 2 diabetes is associated with the increasing rate of obesity and a lack of physical activity in young people.
28
Keenan H, Lipton R, Zierold K, Patel A, Stolte K, Chambers E. What proportion of diabetes in minority young people is actually type 2 [abstract]? American Journal of Epidemiology.
1999;149:S2.
Some children treated with insulin may actually have early-onset type 2, insulin-resistant, diabetes (early2).
This study determined the presence of risk factors for early2 among 814 insulin-treated African American and Hispanic children with diabetes onset before age 18 in Chicago.
Twenty-four percent (195 subjects) may actually have early2 based on one or more of the following diabetes-related characteristics: off insulin therapy more than 2 years after diagnosis, body mass index at diagnosis greater than 27, described by a clinician as atypical, or presence of acanthosis nigricans.
The prevalence of early2 increased with increasing age, and children classed as early2 were more likely to be female and to have at least one parent with diabetes.
The presence of these known risk factors for type 2 diabetes supports the notion that a substantial subgroup of young insulin-treated minority patients may actually require therapy more appropriate to type 2 diabetes.
Lindquist CH, Gower BA, Goran MI. Role of dietary factors in ethnic differences in early risk of cardiovascular disease and type 2 diabetes.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
2000;71(3):725-732.
This study explored whether dietary factors explain ethnic differences in serum lipids and insulin profiles in children, independent of body composition and social class background.
African American children had lower triglyceride, lower insulin sensitivity, and higher acute insulin response than white children.
Compared to white children, African American children had a significantly higher intake of fruit and vegetables and a lower dairy intake.
Carbohydrate and fruit intakes were positively associated with insulin sensitivity, and vegetable intake was negatively associated with acute insulin response.
However, neither macronutrient nor food group intake accounted for the ethnic differences in triglyceride and acute insulin response.
African American children in the sample showed a greater risk of developing cardiovascular disease and type 2 diabetes than did white children, even after adjusting for body composition, social class background, and dietary patterns.
Onyemere K, Lipton R, Baumann E, Silverman B, Brodsky I, Ghai K, Rich B, Thorp F. Onset features of insulin-treated atypical type 1 and early-onset type 2 diabetes in African American and US Latino children.
Diabetes.
1998;47(suppl 1):A87.
Recent attention has focused on type 2 diabetes occurring in youth (early2) and on minority children with an atypical clinical course following diagnosis of diabetes designated insulin-requiring or type 1 (Atyp1).
This study examined a comprehensive, population-based data set of insulin-treated diabetes in African American and Hispanic American children for patients who might be Atyp1 or early2.
These two types of diabetes were identified by one or more of the following criteria: cessation of insulin therapy more than 2 years after diagnosis, use of oral agents with or without insulin, and denoted atypical on the medical record.
Those with obesity at onset were classified
29
early2.
Clinical characteristics can distinguish a substantial minority of insulin-treated African American and Hispanic American children who may have atypical type 2 or early-onset type 2 diabetes at onset from those with classical type 1 diabetes.
Assessment of these characteristics may contribute to initial treatment decisions.
Rosenbloom AL, House DV, Winter WE. Non-insulin dependent diabetes in minority youth: Research priorities and needs.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;37(2):143-152.
The prevalence of type 2 diabetes is increasing in Native American and African American youth, affecting females more frequently than males.
This increase is related to increasing rates of obesity and greater demand for insulin at adolescence.
This review examines epidemiologic data about type 2 diabetes in minority youth and addresses questions about the type of diabetes minority youth have, the relative contributions of environment and genetics, and whether prevention or control is possible.
Environmental and genetic contributors to obesity are also important.
Data are needed comparing various populations and assessing risk factors associated with type 2 diabetes and obesity, costs to the health system and attendant personal and societal costs, clarification of the types of type 2 diabetes in minority populations that will permit appropriate therapy and counseling, and extensive studies of environmental and genetic factors.
Collaborative multicenter studies are needed of prevention or control of obesity and type 2 diabetes.
Umpaichitra V, Bastian W, Taha D, Banerji MA, AvRuskin TW, Castells S. C-peptide and glucagon profiles in minority children with type 2 diabetes mellitus.
Journal of Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism.
2001;86(4):1605-1609.
This study examined the extent of insulin deficiency and glucagon excess in the hyperglycemia of type 2 diabetes in children.
Incidence of this disease in children and adolescents has increased substantially over the past several years.
Because insulin and glucagon action both regulate blood glucose concentration, the authors studied responses to mixed meals in children with type 2 diabetes.
The sample comprised 24 patients with type 2 diabetes and 24 controls, age 9 to 20, predominantly African Americans.
Hyperglycemia is known to inhibit glucagon secretion.
Therefore, the patients with substantial hyperglycemia would be expected to have decreased glucagon responses compared with controls and are thus relatively hyperglucagonemic.
The authors found that relative hypoinsulinemia and hyperglucagonemia represent the pancreatic beta- and alpha-cell dysfunctions in children with type 2 diabetes.
The severity of both beta- and alpha-cell dysfunctions appears to be determined by the duration of diabetes.
African Americans Arslanian S, Suprasongsin C. Differences in the in vivo insulin secretion and sensitivity in health black versus white adolescents.
Journal of Pediatrics.
1996;129:440-443.
Fourteen African American and 16 white healthy adolescents underwent a 2-hour hyperglycemic clamp to investigate racial differences in insulin secretion and sensitivity.
30
First-phase and second-phase insulin concentrations were higher in African American subjects than in white subjects.
The insulin sensitivity index was lower in African American adolescents than in white adolescents.
These findings indicate that significant differences in insulin secretion and sensitivity are detectable in healthy African American versus white adolescents.
Arslanian S, Suprasongsin C, Janosky JE. Insulin secretion and sensitivity in black versus white prepubertal healthy children.
Journal of Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism.
1997;82:1923-1927.
Having previously demonstrated greater insulin secretion and lower insulin sensitivity in African American prepubertal adolescents, the authors investigated whether similar racial differences are present in the prepubertal period or are characteristics of the pubertal period.
The sample comprised 12 African American and 11 white healthy prepubertal children.
Fasting and first-phase insulin concentrations were higher in African Americans than in whites.
No differences occurred in second-phase insulin levels and insulin sensitivity index.
Both maximal oxygen consumption and resting energy expenditure were lower in African American children, whereas insulin-like growth factor I was higher.
After controlling for these differences, race contributed significantly to basal insulin, but not to first-phase insulin.
Previously reported differences in insulin secretion and sensitivity between African American and white adolescents may have their origin in early childhood manifested as hyperinsulinemia.
However, genetic factors versus environmental factors should be carefully scrutinized as potential factors responsible for such differences.
Danadian K, Balasekaran G, Lewy V, Meza MP, Robertson R, Arslanian SA.
Insulin sensitivity in African-American children with and without family history of type 2 diabetes.
Diabetes Care.
1999;22(8):1325-1329.
African Americans are at increased risk for type 2 diabetes.
The authors previously demonstrated that African American children are hyperinsulinemic and insulin-resistant compared with their white American peers.
This investigation assessed the impact of family history of type 2 diabetes on insulin sensitivity in African American children.
Insulin sensitivity was determined in 13 prepubertal healthy children with negative family history and nine with positive family history of type 2 diabetes.
The data suggest that family history of type 2 diabetes is a risk factor for insulin resistance in African American children.
These children manifest metabolic alterations, including impaired insulin-stimulated total and nonoxidative glucose disposal, early in the first decade of life.
This familial tendency, combined with environmental influences, could lead to type 2 diabetes decades later.
31
Gower BA, Nagy TR, Trowbridge CA, Dezenberg C, Goran MI. Fat distribution and insulin response in prepubertal African American and white children.
American Journal of Clinical Nutrition.
1998;67(5):821-827.
Ethnic differences in obesity-related disease prevalence may relate to differences in fat distribution or metabolism.
This study examined the relation between fat distribution and insulin in 73 African American and white children.
African Americans had greater fasting insulin, incremental 30-minute insulin, and incremental area under the insulin curve.
Adjusting insulin indexes for adiposity did not eliminate the significant effect of ethnicity.
In general, relations between adiposity and insulin were stronger in whites than in African Americans.
African American children had higher insulin concentrations than white children after controlling for total body fat, intraabdominal adipose tissue, and subcutaneous abdominal adipose tissue.
However, strong relations between adiposity (total and abdominal) and insulin in both groups suggest that obesity may contribute to disease risk regardless of ethnicity.
Johnson MS, Figueroa-Colon R, Huang TT, Dwyer JH, Goran MI. Longitudinal changes in body fat in African American and Caucasian children: Influence of fasting insulin and insulin sensitivity.
Journal of Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism.
2001;86(7):3182-3187.
Obesity is associated with hyperinsulinemia and reduced insulin sensitivity.
However, it is not clear whether these risk factors for type 2 diabetes occur as a result of obesity or contribute to the development of obesity.
This study explored whether baseline measures or changes in insulin measures over time in 137 children were associated with longitudinal changes in body fat mass during growth.
Total fat mass increased with time, but the rate of increase was not significantly influenced by race, sex, or Tanner stage.
The authors found that growth-related increases in body fat were significantly associated with increases in fasting insulin and acute insulin response and decreases in insulin sensitivity.
McClain MR, Srinivasan SR, Chen W, Steinmann WC, Berenson GS. Risk of type 2 diabetes mellitus in young adults from a biracial community: The Bogalusa Heart Study.
Preventive Medicine.
2000;31:1-7.
This study examined characteristics of young adult offspring of persons with type 2 diabetes to determine early abnormalities in African American and white persons at risk.
Positive family history of diabetes or impaired fasting glucose and type 2 diabetes in young adults of both races were significantly associated with obesity and abdominal fat, blood pressure, cholesterol, and glucose homeostasis.
The magnitude of the differences in obesity and abdominal fat measures and plasma glucose between individuals with and without parental diabetes was greater among African Americans than whites.
Furthermore, African American offspring with and without parental diabetes had unfavorable profiles of obesity and abdominal fat measures, blood pressure, insulin, and insulin resistance index.
The risk factors of young adults with parental type 2 diabetes or conditions of impaired fasting glucose and type 2 diabetes can be detected early.
These
32
observations have implications for early prevention and intervention, especially for African Americans.
Pihoker C, Scott CR, Lensing SY, Cradock MM, Smith J. Non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus in African-American youths of Arkansas.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;37(2):97-102.
Type 2 diabetes occurs more frequently in certain adult populations, including African Americans.
The incidence of type 2 diabetes has increased recently among African American youths in Arkansas.
Clinical presentations among these youths vary from asymptomatic to severe diabetic ketoacidosis.
This study examined chart review data to determine which physical, biochemical, and autoimmune characteristics were most helpful in appropriate classification of type 2 diabetes versus type 1 diabetes.
Several diagnostic and treatment issues need to be addressed to improve the management of African American youths with type 2 diabetes.
Pinhas-Hamiel O, Dolan LM, Zeitler PS.
Diabetic ketoacidosis among obese African-American adolescents with NIDDM.
Diabetes Care.
1997;20:484-486.
This study examined whether ketosis at the time of presentation occurs among African American adolescents with type 2 diabetes.
Of 70 adolescents, islet cell antibody determinations were available and negative on 42 subjects.
In the African American patients, 42 percent presented with ketonuria and 25 percent presented with diabetic ketoacidosis.
In comparison, none of the white adolescents with type 2 diabetes had ketonuria at presentation or during their subsequent course.
Previously diagnosed hypertension was present in 42 percent of patients presenting with ketosis, compared with 17 percent of the general type 2 diabetes population at Children's Hospital Medical Center.
The authors concluded that ketosis may occur among African American adolescents with type 2 diabetes, as has been previously reported among African American adults with type 2 diabetes.
Therefore, ketosis in obese young African American patients with new-onset diabetes does not necessarily imply the presence of type 1 diabetes and insulin dependence.
Willi SM, Kennedy A, Wojciechowski B, Garvey WT. Insulin resistance and defective glucoseinsulin coupling in ketosis-prone type 2 diabetes of African-American youth [abstract].
Diabetes.
1997;46(suppl 1):A306.
A form of early-onset diabetes, with persistent C-peptide production and negative islet cell antibodies, has been reported with increasing frequency in various ethnic groups throughout the United States.
Although these patients frequently present with signs of severe insulin deficiency (e.g., ketoacidosis), the clinical manifestations of this condition typically evolve to become more characteristic of type 2 diabetes.
This study examined insulin secretion and insulin action in seven African American adolescents and young adults with this condition.
The investigators found that the subset of juvenile African Americans with a ketosis-prone variant of type 2 diabetes manifest a dual defect of severe insulin resistance in combination with absent glucose stimulated insulin secretion.
The presence of insulin in secretory vesicles of beta-cells, as evident from response to
33
glucagon stimulation, suggests that careful examination of the aberration in glucoseinsulin coupling is paramount to defining the mechanism or mechanisms of insulin deficiency in these patients.
Young-Hyman D, Schlundt DG, Herman L, De Luca F, Counts D. Evaluation of the insulin resistance syndrome in 5- to 10-year old overweight/obese African American children.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24(8):1359-1364.
This study characterized the insulin sensitivity of overweight African American children screened for participation in a diabetes prevention study and identified the association of insulin sensitivity with obesity, hyperlipidemia, and hypertension.
Girls and older, heavier children produced significantly more insulin.
As body mass index increased, insulin sensitivity decreased significantly, particularly in girls.
Insulin sensitivity was inversely correlated with increases in blood pressure, triglycerides, subcutaneous fat, percentage of total body fat, and Tanner stage, but it was not correlated with low-density lipoprotein and high-density lipoprotein cholesterol.
Reduced insulin sensitivity and the cluster of risk factors known as the insulin resistance syndrome are already apparent in overweight African American children.
Young African American girls, in particular, already show evidence of hyperinsulinemia.
Monitoring those risk factors known to be part of insulin resistance syndrome should become part of routine medical care for overweight African American children.
Asians Kitagawa T, Owada M, Urakami T, Tajima N. Epidemiology of type 1 (insulin-dependent) and type 2 (non-insulin-dependent) diabetes mellitus in Japanese children.
Diabetes Research and Clinical Practice.
1994;24(suppl):S7-S13.
Slow-onset type 1 diabetes is often reported in Japan.
From 1975 through 1990, the incidence rates of type 2 diabetes in Japanese schoolchildren showed as much as an approximate 1.5-fold increase along with a similar increase in the prevalence of obesity.
About 80 percent of the children with type 2 diabetes were obese.
A predominance of female children developing diabetes was seen in both types of diabetes in Japan.
Nonobese type 2 diabetes in children was more common in females than in males.
Compared to the national average, the mean height of Japanese children with type 1 diabetes was no different, but children with type 2 diabetes were significantly taller.
Kitagawa T, Owada M, Urakami T, Yamauchi K. Increased incidence of non-insulin dependent diabetes mellitus among Japanese schoolchildren correlates with an increased intake of animal protein and fat.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;37(2):111-115.
Between 1974 and 1994, type 2 diabetes was diagnosed in 188 of more than 7 million Tokyo schoolchildren tested for glycosuria followed by oral glucose tolerance testing.
Incidence of type 2 diabetes in youth has continued to increase since 1976.
Although the daily energy intake has not changed significantly, the consumption of animal protein and fat by the Japanese population has greatly increased during the past two decades.
This 34
change in diet, along with low levels of physical activity, may exacerbate insulin resistance and glucose intolerance.
Kobayashi K, Amemiya S, Higashida K, Ishihara T, Sawanobori E, Kobayashi K, Mochizuki M, Kikuchi N, Tokuyama K, Nakazawa S. Pathogenic factors of glucose intolerance in obese Japanese adolescents with type 2 diabetes.
Metabolism.
2000;49(2):186-191.
This study examined pathogenic factors involved in the progression to type 2 diabetes in obese Japanese adolescents.
Subjects included 18 nondiabetic obese adolescents, 12 obese adolescents with type 2 diabetes on diet therapy, 10 obese adolescents with type 2 diabetes manifesting ketosis at onset or with a history of treatment with hypoglycemic agents, and 26 nonobese adolescent control subjects.
Glucose disappearance constant was decreased significantly with the progression to severe diabetes in the obese groups.
Although insulin sensitivity and glucose effectiveness did not differ significantly among the three obese groups, both parameters were significantly lower in each obese group versus the nonobese controls.
The authors concluded that an early manifestation of type 2 diabetes with occasional ketosis at onset may result from beta-cell dysfunction to glucose stimulation.
These findings may help researchers gain a better understanding of the progression to adolescent, early-onset, obese type 2 diabetes and its severity.
Lee WR.
The changing demography of diabetes mellitus in Singapore.
Diabetes Research and Clinical Practice.
2000;50(suppl 2):S35-S39.
The prevalence of diabetes among adults in Singapore rose steadily from 1975 to 1998.
Malay women, Indian women, and Indian men were at highest risk.
Diabetes, the sixth leading cause of death, was a factor in 39.7 percent of strokes and 9.3 percent of all deaths in Singapore.
The prevalence of obesity among adults was 6 percent in 1998 and highest among Malays (16.2 percent), Indians (12.2 percent), and Chinese (3.8 percent).
About 12 percent of schoolchildren in Singapore are obese.
Increased efforts must be made to change lifestyle and eating patterns, reduce childhood obesity, and encourage adults to make lifelong exercise part of the Singaporean way of life.
This article recommends screening for diabetes in obese schoolchildren and improving quality of care for people with diabetes, including enlisting the aid of community organizations to improve access to diabetes education, monitoring, support, and complications screening services.
Yokoyama H, Okudaira M, Otani T, Takaike H, Miuira J, Saeki A, Uchigata Y, Omori Y.
Existence of early-onset NIDDM Japanese demonstrating severe diabetic complications.
Diabetes Care.
1997;20:844-847.
This study identified clinical characteristics of early-onset type 2 diabetes in patients with poor glycemic control, often requiring insulin therapy, and a higher familial prevalence of diabetes.
Of 135 patients, 67 percent developed proliferative retinopathy before the first visit; 60 percent developed diabetic nephropathy at a mean age of 31; 23 percent developed renal failure requiring dialysis at a mean age of 35; 24 percent became blind at a mean age of 32; and 10 percent developed atherosclerotic vascular disease at a mean
35
age of 36.
Some Japanese patients with early-onset type 2 diabetes developed severe diabetic complications in their youth.
Most had no symptoms of diabetes and did not receive regular treatment for diabetes until after they had developed severe diabetic complications.
Although the relevant prevalence and the pathogenetic mechanism underlying the rapid onset of the complications remain to be determined, prolonged inadequate treatment of and familial predisposition to diabetes may be contributing factors.
Yokoyama H, Okudaira M, Otani T, Watanabe C, Takaike H, Miuira J, Yamada H, Mutou K, Satou A, Uchigata Y, Iwamoto Y.
High incidence of diabetic nephropathy in early-onset Japanese NIDDM patients.
Diabetes Care.
1998;21(7):1080-1085.
This study examined incidence and determinants for the development of diabetic nephropathy in Japanese patients with early-onset type 2 diabetes.
Among patients whose mean HbA1c was around 7 percent or below, few developed nephropathy.
The incidence of nephropathy increased with increasing mean HbA1c level.
The incidence rate of diabetic nephropathy in Japanese patients with early-onset type 2 diabetes is potentially high, similar to or higher than that in Pima Indians with type 2 diabetes or Caucasian patients with type 1 diabetes.
Diabetic nephropathy in patients in their thirties or forties with type 2 diabetes is likely to be an early feature that leads to diabetic endstage renal failure, new cases of which have markedly increased in Japan.
Type 2 diabetes is a serious disease if near-normal glycemia is not achieved.
Hispanic Americans Glaser NS, Jones KL. Non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus in Mexican-American children.
Journal of Western Medicine.
1998;168:11-16.
The authors reviewed the medical records of 18 children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes.
Twelve of the patients were Mexican American.
The mean age of onset was 12.8 years.
Common findings were obesity and acanthosis nigricans.
Ketonuria was present at diagnosis in five of 15 patients and acidosis in two of 14 patients.
A family history of type 2 diabetes was present in 13 of 15 patients, with seven having three or more generations affected.
Type 2 diabetes should be suspected in children with diabetes presenting without ketoacidosis and with acanthosis nigricans, obesity, and a strong family history, particularly among Mexican Americans.
Children with these characteristics should undergo testing of endogenous insulin secretion for appropriate therapeutic intervention.
Hale DE, Danney MM. Non-insulin dependent diabetes in Hispanic youth (type 2Y) [abstract].
Diabetes.
1998;47(suppl 1):A82.
Because type 2 diabetes has been considered a disease of adults, diabetes screening programs have consistently excluded youth.
Recent studies in African Americans suggest an increasing number of type 2 diabetes in youth (type 2Y).
Of 560 patients
36
diagnosed with diabetes since 1990 in San Antonio, 101 (18 percent) had type 2Y.
The number of type 2Y cases has risen from one in 1990 to 30 in 1997, whereas cases of type 1 diabetes have remained constant.
Patients with type 2Y are more likely to be Hispanic, be female, have a parent or grandparent with diabetes, be obese, and have acanthosis nigricans.
This study suggests that type 2 diabetes may be increasing in Hispanic youth.
A well-planned population-based screening study for type 2 diabetes in populations at risk for diabetes (e.g., minority groups, those with a strong family history of diabetes, obese persons) is needed.
Lacar ES, Soto X, Riley WJ. Adolescent obesity in a low-income Mexican American district in South Texas.
Archives of Pediatrics 
2000;154(8):837-840.
This study examined the prevalence of adolescent obesity in a southern Texas population that is preponderantly low-income Mexican Americans.
Of 2,149 girls and 2,226 boys age 12 to 17 enrolled in four rural secondary schools, 18 percent were at risk for obesity, and 22.1 percent were obese.
Based on body mass index calculations, the data revealed a much higher prevalence of obesity in Mexican American adolescents than that found by the 1988-94 National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES III), which found that 11.5 percent of adolescents were obese and which had a small sample size for Mexican Americans.
NHANES III's significant underestimation of obesity prevalence in poor Mexican American adolescents consequently leads to underestimation of the public health risks as well as the present and future costs of health care associated with obesity in this population.
Neufeld ND, Raffel LJ, Landon C, Chen YD, Vadheim CM. Early presentation of type 2 diabetes in Mexican-American youth.
Diabetes Care.
1998;21(1):80-86.
This study examined the medical records of Mexican American youths with diabetes to assess the frequency and clinical features of type 2 diabetes.
At presentation, all 21 children and adolescents with type 2 diabetes were obese, 62 percent had no ketonuria, and fasting C-peptide levels were elevated.
Diabetes was easily controlled with diet, sulfonylureas, or low-dose insulin.
Compliance was poor, and three subjects developed diabetic complications.
A school survey identified 28 adolescents with diabetes, 75 percent more than expected.
Hispanic enrollment at each school was highly correlated with the number of students with diabetes.
Genetic susceptibility to type 2 diabetes, when coupled with obesity, can produce type 2 diabetes in Mexican American children.
This diagnosis should be considered in young Hispanic patients, who might otherwise be assumed to have type 1 diabetes, and in overweight Hispanic youth with a family history of type 2 diabetes, for whom intervention may prevent or delay diabetes onset.
37
North American Indians Dabelea D, Hanson RL, Bennett PH, Roumain I, Knowler WC, Pettitt DJ. Increasing prevalence of type 2 diabetes in American Indian children.
Diabetologia.
1998;41:904-910.
Type 2 diabetes, until recently considered rare in children, is increasing among children in populations with high rates of type 2 diabetes in adults.
This study examined the prevalence of the disease in 5,274 Pima Indian children in three 10-year time periods for three age groups: 5 to 9, 10 to 14, and 15 to 19 years.
In children age 10 and older, the prevalence of diabetes increased over time.
Weight and frequency of exposure to diabetes in utero also increased, accounting for most of the increase in diabetes prevalence in Pima Indian children over the past 30 years.
Type 2 diabetes is now common in American Indian children age 10 and older and has increased dramatically over time, along with increasing weight.
A vicious cycle related to an increase in the frequency of exposure to diabetes in utero appears to be an important feature of this epidemic.
Dabelea D, Knowler WC, Pettitt DJ. Effect of diabetes in pregnancy on offspring: Follow-up research in the Pima Indians.
Journal of Maternal-Fetal Medicine.
2000;9(1):83-88.
Since 1965, Pima Indians of Arizona have participated in a study of diabetes and its complications.
This population has high rates of type 2 diabetes that has a strong genetic component and develops at young ages.
Offspring of women who had diabetes during pregnancy were more obese and had a higher prevalence of type 2 diabetes.
Exposure to the diabetic intrauterine environment was responsible for about 40 percent of type 2 diabetes in children age 5 to 19 between 1987 and 1996, about twice the attributable risk found between 1967 and 1976.
More than 70 percent of persons with prenatal exposure have type 2 diabetes at age 25 to 34.
In Pima Indians, much of the increase in childhood type 2 diabetes can be attributed to the diabetic intrauterine environment, which may contribute to the alarming rise of this disease nationally.
Dean H. NIDDM-Y in First Nation Children in Canada.
Clinical Pediatrics.
1998;39:89-96.
Prevalence of type 2 diabetes in youth in many First Nations communities in Manitoba and northwestern Ontario is now several times greater than the prevalence of type 1 diabetes in the general pediatric population.
The number of undiagnosed, asymptomatic cases is predicted to be at least two times greater than the known cases.
Serious complications of diabetes are known to occur in the early third decade of life and within 10 years of diagnosis.
Nonpharmacologic management in youths has been successful in short-term studies but generally unsuccessful in achieving long-term acceptable glycemic control.
The safety and efficacy of pharmacologic interventions have not been proven in children.
Consistent community-based screening programs and randomized controlled trials of pharmacologic interventions are urgently needed to test the safety and efficacy of these agents in primary prevention and secondary prevention of complications in youths.
38
Dean HJ, Mundy RL, Moffatt M. Non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus in Indian children in Manitoba.
Canadian Medical Association Journal.
1992;147:52-57.
This study examined 20 native Indian children in Manitoba, Canada, with type 2 diabetes and sought to raise physician awareness about the difficulties in classifying and managing hyperglycemia in Indian children.
All 16 children whose family history could be confirmed had at least one parent with type 2 diabetes.
Five of the 20 complained of polyuria or nocturia; the remainder presented with asymptomatic glycosuria.
All were encouraged to follow a weight-reduction diet and exercise regimen.
The clinical features of type 2 diabetes in Indian children younger than age 15 occasionally mimic those of type 1 diabetes.
A strong family history of type 2 diabetes and lack of diabetic ketoacidosis during followup support the diagnosis of type 2 diabetes.
Adherence to a diet and exercise regimen has been poor.
The conventional diabetes education approach may not be appropriate for this population.
Fagot-Campagna A, Burrows NR, Williamson DF.
The public health epidemiology of type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents: A case study of American Indian adolescents in the Southwestern United States.
Clinica Chimica Acta. 1999;286(l-2):81-95.
Because obesity and physical inactivity are increasing in children and adolescents, the prevalence of pediatric type 2 diabetes may increase and eventually become an important cause of adult morbidity and mortality.
Data on type 2 diabetes in adolescents age 15 to 19 years were compared between two sources: systematic population screening of the Gila River Indian Community by the National Institutes of Health (NIH) and reported cases by the Indian Health Service (IHS) from clinics in the southwestern United States.
The current NIH estimate of prevalence of type 2 diabetes was much higher than the IHS estimate (5.1 percent versus 0.46 percent).
Both data sources, however, suggest a secular increase in prevalence between 1986 and 1996-97.
These data are used to discuss the principles, applications, and challenges for accurate epidemiologic assessment of type 2 diabetes in children and adolescents.
Fagot-Campagna A, Knowler WC, Pettitt DJ. Type 2 diabetes in Pima Indian children: Cardiovascular risk factors at diagnosis and 10 years later [abstract].
Diabetes.
1998;47(suppl 1):A155.
Among Pima Indian children age 5 to 19, this study compared cardiovascular risk factors in 100 children at diagnosis of type 2 diabetes, 546 with impaired glucose tolerance, and 4,092 10- to 19-year-old children with normal glucose tolerance.
Children with impaired glucose tolerance or diabetes had a significantly higher prevalence of obesity and hypertension at diagnosis (but not hypercholesterolemia) than those with normal glucose tolerance.
Pima Indian children with diabetes have a high prevalence of cardiovascular risk factors, especially abnormal albumin excretion, which worsen during the next decade.
As the prevalence of type 2 diabetes is rising among Pima Indian children as in other populations, cardiovascular diseases will be expected to increase in young adults of high-risk populations if preventive measures are not successfully instituted.
39
Harris SB, Perkins BA, Whalen-Brough E. Non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus among First Nations children.
New entity among First Nations people of north western Ontario.
Canadian Family Physician.
1996;42:869-876.
The authors describe the emergence of a new clinical form of type 2 diabetes among First Nations children in Canada.
The study sample comprised 18 First Nations youths younger than age 16 via the Sioux Lookout Zone Hospital Diabetes Program registry in northwestern Ontario.
Age-adjusted prevalence was 2.5 per 1,000 in this population, the highest prevalence reported to date for type 2 diabetes in this age group.
Typical patients were asymptomatic, obese adolescents who were not prone to ketosis and whose families had a strong history of type 2 diabetes.
Harwell TS, McDowall JM, Moore K, Fagot-Campagna A, Helgerson SD, Gohdes D. Establishing surveillance for diabetes in American Indian youth.
Diabetes Care.
2001;24(6):1029-1032.
This study determined prevalence estimates to monitor diabetes, particularly type 2 diabetes, in American Indian youth.
The sample comprised all youth with diabetes identified from the Billings Area Indian Health Service database in Montana and Wyoming from 1997 to 1999.
The authors identified 52 case subjects with diabetes, three of whom had diabetes secondary to other conditions.
Of the remaining 49 case subjects, 25 (51 percent) were categorized as having probable type 2 diabetes and 14 (29 percent) as having probable type 1 diabetes; 10 (20 percent) could not be categorized because of missing or negative information.
Prevalence estimates for diabetes of all types, type 1 diabetes, and type 2 diabetes were 2.3, 0.6, and 1.1, respectively, per 1,000 youth younger than age 20.
These definitions may be useful for surveillance in primary care settings until further studies develop feasible case definitions for monitoring trends in diabetes among youth.
Pettitt DJ, Knowler WC. Long-term effects of the intrauterine environment, birth weight, and breast-feeding in Pima Indians.
Diabetes Care.
1998;21(suppl 2):B138-B141.
This study evaluated long-term effects of diabetic pregnancy on Pima Indian offspring and examined how its prevalence is influenced by early life events known to influence diabetes in nonpregnant Pima Indian adults.
The authors found that diabetes during pregnancy is a major risk factor for diabetes and hyperglycemia in the offspring.
Diabetes in the next generation is less common among breastfed children than among bottle-fed children.
The highest rates of diabetes during pregnancy were found among women with a birthweight below 2.5 kg. Infants of women with diabetes during pregnancy are at risk of becoming obese and developing type 2 diabetes at a young age.
Diabetes in women of childbearing age is influenced by factors occurring early in life, such as birthweight and type of infant feeding.
40
Pettitt DJ, Nelson RG, Saad MF, Bennett PH, Knowler WC. Diabetes and obesity in the offspring of Pima Indian women with diabetes during pregnancy.
Diabetes Care.
1993;16(1):310-314.
This study examined the long-term effects of diabetic pregnancy on the offspring of Pima Indians in Arizona by reviewing studies published by the Phoenix Epidemiology and Clinical Research Branch of the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases since the inception of the longitudinal diabetes studies in 1965.
On average, the offspring of women who had diabetes during pregnancy were more obese and had higher glucose concentrations and more diabetes than the offspring of women who developed diabetes after pregnancy or who remained nondiabetic.
Although no new analyses were attempted, several older publications were updated by repeating the analyses on later, expanded data sets.
This study concluded that diabetic pregnancy, in addition to its effects on the newborn, has effects on the subsequent growth and glucose metabolism of the offspring.
These effects are in addition to genetically determined traits.
Williams RC, Long JC, Hanson RL, Sievers ML, Knowler WC. Individual estimates of European genetic admixture associated with lower body-mass index, plasma glucose, and prevalence of type 2 diabetes in Pima Indians.
American Journal of Human Genetics.
2000;66(2):527-538.
Individual genetic admixture estimates (IA) from European Americans were computed in 7,996 members of the Gila River Indian Community in Arizona.
Parental populations for the analysis were European Americans and full-heritage Pima Indians.
Nondiabetic persons had significantly more European admixture.
Their results illustrate the ongoing evolution of populations by the mechanism of gene flow and its effect on disease risk in the groups with admixture.
When the two parental populations differ in disease prevalence, higher or lower risk is associated with admixture, depending on the origin of the admixed alleles and the relative magnitude of the disease prevalence in the parental populations.
These data also illustrate the strong genetic components in type 2 diabetes and are consistent with one susceptibility locus common to obesity and diabetes.
41
